I disagree.  Said corporations aren't really worried about stopping the infringement of their content as much as they are fighting a new paradigm which doesn't involve them. See the lawsuit against Youtube which cost Google 100 million to defend against even though Viacom didn't have a leg to stand on. Were they worried about infringement?  No, Google does everything in their power to stop it and immediately responds to any allegation of infringement, no matter how unsupported or unproven - taking down waves of legitimate content in the process.  In effect, Google is firebombing their own properties for Viacom's benefit - and that's not good enough, because Google isn't paying Viacom the big bucks. A quote I read recently stated that Google was a whiner for mentioning the cost of the lawsuit - Viacom deserved all that money in the first place, and it was Google's fault for not paying.  See also the war against Creative Commons &amp; copyleft by ASCAP.
[Indeed.](http://tardis.wikia.com/wiki/World_War_Three)
Your first step should be acquiring an attorney that will be willing to take on Blizzard, because you *will* be sued.  That said, good luck!
Seconded
Not with a bang but a batvader?
Thanks for the update.  It's nice to see curtain things overturned.  
Did you guys get your invitations?
well you have to die of something.
came here to say this
yeah i watched it twice
Very true.  I'm just saying that, from a philosophical/practical standpoint, bullying is not a justification for murder, and there is even more doubt involved in this particular case.
idk maybe fusion power? The minds at NASA are very smart and creative. Space is very hard on the human body I see a great deal of bio advancement
don't you mean decreased? if it increased, you're saying we have a lot more brilliant people now compared to stupid people.
OLD
One of the Toadies is a [redditor](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/bayl4/reddit_are_any_of_you_famous/c0lukja).  
Dear Scientist, can you explain physics to me in a reddit post?
Life sucks. Get over it.
Car fire here too, behind a place I worked at.  Anything that isn't high priority (someone can die, damage can spread, etc.) I get the local PD/FD's non emergency number.
Sadly, no.  It does not have a tray that ejects, it pulls the disc in similar to what is found in a car's CD player.  I think you can hold down the space bar when you power on and that will eject the disc.
So you are saying we should be setting these people up to be the cannon fodder for the terrorist attacks and kill two birds with one stone?  I like it.
Fuck You Nugent, You Fucking CHICKENHAWK http://www.nocompromise.org/news/000731c.html ON MILITARY SERVICE He claims that  30 days before his draft board physical, he stopped all forms of personal hygiene.  The last 10 days, he ingested nothing but Vienna sausages and Pepsi; and a week before his physical, he stopped using bathrooms altogether, virtually living inside pants caked with his own excrement, stained by his urine.  That spectacle won Nugent a deferment, he says. "... but if I would have gone over there, I'd have been killed, or I'd have killed, or I'd killed all the hippies in the foxholes...I would have killed everybody." - Detroit Free Press Magazine , July 15, 1990
The question, yes. It also means I'm partially colourblind.
That is a misperception.  North and west of Reading, yes.  But south and east of Reading is a more liberal crowd.  I hate that Berks county is seen that way, and its the damn redneck's fault.
I can't stand the generic TV Cockney accent (see: Eastenders).  Love Welsh and Dutch though, in general.
Get a new roommate :D
argentine redditor here, I recommend:  Nod - www.myspace.com/nodensincro Sancamaleon - www.sancamaleon.com.ar
Actually, some interpretations of quantum physics *require* all possible outcomes to exist in parallel universes.  But you're also high, or should be.
Hm. OK, that's somewhat better. She plays piano about as well as I do, which... really isn't anything to brag about. However I can't sing at the same time. Also, I do not have that hat.  Hm. Watched a second acoustic. She plays better than I do.  Still don't care for her, but now I acknowledge her ability.
Thanks for the gentle reminder.....yeah, sometimes it does not go our way, but it's still an important part of our way of government.
There is no way that Lois could carry Superman's baby. 
Damn - I'm out of town tomorrow...  next year, Gadget, next year.
@stemgang  "I had to pull a "What about the wimminz?" just the other day. Men suffer great injustice in the West, but regarding men's rights in Iran...where women have no rights at all...was a stretch too far."  Actually, even in a place like Iran there are many important men's issues. For example, take a look at their war with Iraq. The Basij were known for rounding boys up and using them to detonate mines by forcing them to run across mine fields. Also, in Iran, widowed husbands are only awarded half the amount of compensation money that widowed wives get; and in Islam men are mandated to take care of women, even when they can take care of themselves. And then there's the issue of stoning. Men are only buried waste deep before they are executed so more of their body will be exposed to the rocks and they will be stoned longer.  Equal rights isn't a zero-sum game and some times both genders get screwed at the same time. Iran is such a place, where both men and women are oppressed. I think your being very apprehensive about Iranian culture, and as a result you're rushing to a conclusion about how things are there. Definitely, it's not fun to be a female there. It's not fun to be a male there either, though.
Example?
you found the secret rat room?  protip for the winemaker mission: The hanging barrels are weak you can make them fall with a coin
Our D&amp;D setup was disturbed. We couldn't find anyone that *wanted* to DM. We had plenty of willing players though. Also, we're buying 100-sided dice.
I am interested in getting a response for this.
&gt;I miss The Simpsons.  But they're still on the ai—oh, I see. =[
The DX version had an exclusive color dungeon made specifically for the game boy color.
That's only because you aren't ignorant, unlike Americans.  /Sarcasms tag  /Also paradox tag.
I wish my friend had this bike, i would hate pedaling my fatass friends around.
There goes the fucking garden...
"The universe is indifferent." - Don Draper
This always puts things in perspective for me
Matchday is consistently ok. It doesn't tend to crash much and the video quality is generally not terrible.  I don't know that it's 40 bucks good, but it's serviceable. 
Definitely counted five hops.
I was playing a lot of pyro or engineer, but now I'm just sort of going around the classes trying to get some experience with all of them.
While you may like to think it is theft, it is not.  You cannot be charged with theft.
look it up in reddit.
Most annoying neighbour ever!
I've heard Dr. Who is pretty good but couldn't get through more than a few episodes.  I suppose I should give it the benefit of the doubt like I did with Farscape (although Farscape went from cheesy to awesome post haste).  I'm more of a stick with it once I get hooked kinda guy so I'm not fond of having a great season of Dark Angel only to look forward to a downward spiral.  Stargate, and Fringe have both been been on my radar as possibilities.  I don't know much about Babylon 5.  I'll check that out as well.  Thanks for the suggestions.
They have a U.S. store/section with the same deal too.
It is morally wrong after all.
Whole grain, smaller portion size, maybe do it after you exercise
scott c is illustrator from double fine right?
Fuck off nigger
Hardcore brick-on-washing machine action.  Bitch takes it full on in the drum.
Not greatly.  There's only an hour's difference, so if we scheduled a practice/match at 10:00pm we'd be playing at 11:00 for you.  
[here's my loadout from a couple years ago. I need to update the picture.](http://www.flickr.com/photos/ryjones/2878068853/)
You're sick.
It's an ambidextrous conspiracy?  You must be a libertarian.
[Everglades Alligator Farm](http://www.everglades.com/) on your way there or out of the farm [Robert is Here](http://www.robertishere.com/xcart/home.php) they have some great shakes. [John PenneKamp Park](http://www.pennekamppark.com/snorkeling.html) awesome snorkeling tour to an underwater statue. There is so much more, I'll have to get back to you. Oh, a fellow [redditor](http://www.reddit.com/r/IAmA/comments/b43ns/i_grew_up_on_an_alligator_farm_ama/) runs the alligator farm, maybe he can get you free tickets. 
Didn't mean it like that...just saying...man up and get out there...don't be shy. You'll only have this night once....go have some fun.
I'm convinced. I want an alcohol system too!
There ought to be a better way to share. like a request system... I've got an extra, btw. PM me for it  EDIT: gone.
We don't even allow "bless you" in our home for that reason. All this religious talk is a form of [neuro-linguistic programming](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Neuro-linguistic_programming).
yea brah
Reeder, Plants v. Zombies HD, Osfoora (Twitter) HD, Instapaper Pro, Flight Control HD, Strategery, iBooks, Flipboard, Real Racing HD
I believe you're thinking of "Party on, Wayne/Garth."
Shake Hands with the Devil
The show is British you fucking idiot *and* the show contains a statement that is just plain dubious to anyone (British, American, or otherwise) who is paying careful attention.  For some reason, you've chosen to focus on your assumption that I object to British people using British words on British television, instead of my real problem, which is the statement itself.  For the record, what do *you* think they were saying?  Is it:  1.  Among black males aged 17 in the US, prisoners outnumber people who go to a thing that British people call "college", which is something you do from ages 16 to 18 before going to University, even though *no such thing exists in the US for them to go to*, or 2.  It is alarming that, among black males aged 17 in the US, prisoners outnumber people who go to a thing Americans call "college" (and that British people call "university").  My problem is that #1 is either nonsensical (if you take it pretty literally) or *factually false* (if you take "college" to mean the American near-equivalent, which would be the last few years of high school).  My other problem is that #2 is trivially true but meaningless because in the US few people of *any* sex or ethnic group go to post-secondary education at the age of 17.  Which one of the two do you think is the right interpretation?  Does the statement make sense to you?
How old is your daughter?
Yeap, one of my friends cancelled her plan to study in Sweden because of this.   Btw, not only Sweden, the same thing also applies to Germany (they have recently introduced meager amount of tuition fee), but also Finland.  (and yeah, there are quite a number of courses offered in English)
It depends. Mostly for me, it's fun and playfully aggressive. I can see there's a line, but I enjoy crossing it
I don't get it?
Wait, so he went whitehat and *told* them about it in time to fix it? At a *black*hat convention?
***9:15pm***   Patient A is enjoying concious thoughts.   ***9:16pm***   Patient A is now aware of nothing, not even his own memories, as if he suddenly fell into a coma.
Thanks for saying so. Where do you buy them?
Sinaris
day in the life is awesome, but i also love i've got a feeling http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=uJPmB6HqcTY
I have a pond (not pool) on some land I own. It's basically a big 1 acre hole dug into the ground. It's kept full naturally with rainwater and surface runoff.   I'm wondering how to find out if it's safe to swim in. What should I test and how often should I test it?
Thanks for the advice, I think she's worth feeling it out.
[](/happy "tee hee I'm part of the group now")
bring home some soy sauce, some snow peas, and a recipe for kitten McNuggets--the roommate will become the one with the irrational fear!
I, too, was disappointed to find out Vinnie hadn't murdered anybody. I'm starting to think Vinnie was innocent all along!
blow me asshole. 
&gt; “Now, you could even argue whether being a Christianity is actually a religion, or is it a nationality, way of life, cult whatever you want to call it. Now certainly we do protect our religions, but at the same time this is something we are going to have to face.”
I swear, when I get to around 60 or 70, I'm going to just go and punch every single teenager I come across somewhere in the face as my last valiant rampage.   This is pathetic.
I agree.  This was my favorite game of 2009 easily.
I wonder what color they actually were
You don't really get the concept of trolling do you?  For a start, try a less obvious account name...
So... Basically you're saying that atheist and religious zealots need to shut the fuck up and stop treating those who disagree with them like idiots? OKAY!  I don't have an issue with atheism, nor do I have an issue with religion and either group trying to educate people on their beliefs. I DO however have an issue with people that feel the need to force these beliefs or insult people who don't hold these beliefs. Judging from how you people on reddit act, I'm willing to bet that a majority of you would hold someone from employment or use other methods against religious people if you were in positions of power to do so. But maybe that's why I'm not an alpha male: I don't INSIST upon MYSELF.
Best AMA in a long time. First: Is there any index and metric for pools in the world? Mostly hotels, public swimming pools and water parks. Maybe a certificate that actually carries some authority. Second: Do you reckon that people are likely to contract asthma or something similar from (too) chlorinated public indoor pools? Third: Is there a good book on all the ins and outs of pools and water hygiene?
Nope.  One company will have the rights to the distribution network as his government doesn't have the power to mandate sharing.
The issue isn't whether its good or not, its the fact that she didn't know whether it was and its her job to know.
No dude, that's what toilet paper is for.
What's wrong with feargorm? I saw his name in that sc2 nuke video, and I felt like I knew someone famous or something, it was weird.  I liked how we had one person from each team earlier though. =/ oh well.
My Uncle's miniature Italian Greyhound named Kitty. 
I don't know but I was basing my assumption that all of them were off that 'cause he didn't even have a custom model.  ######When I did it I went 1000 over before I just stopped moving units, and I was 1a2a3a the entire time.
&gt;You mean to tell me that 40 or so grown men and women don’t have the time or the recourses to launch a company? That seems unlikely.  Under the capitalism we know and love? All too likely! Nearly all of those 40 people will be working full time just to get by and they will feel like they don't have the time. They mostly won't have the information. They shouldn't be like this, they should be living below their means and saving their wages and planning to invest them communally, but sadly people are irrational and victimized and foolish and marketed to and a few hundred years of capitalist production has seriously atomized social relations. Undoubtedly they *could* do it but they don't do it. Some of my free time is spent helping to educate working people on how not to screw themselves over financially, how not to end up in debt slavery, how to use their wage to their long-term benefit, how to stop buying crap they don't need. Most working people don't even have a rudimentary household budget, let alone the initiative it takes to game out revenues over a couple of years. Bourgeois parents pass those skills along to their kids, but nobody teaches these things to the working class. This sounds negative, and I don't want to condemn people for living in a society that prevents them from living up to their potential. I honestly believe that shown a path out of this consumerist nonsense people will take it, but it's not on anyone's agenda because it doesn't make anyone money, except for the individuals who figure it out and suddenly realize that saving $300 is better than buying an iPhone especially when they buy that iPhone on credit.  &gt;Ill submit that in a capitalist system Society will always be hierarchical but companies need not be that way.  Agreed! That's why we anarchists ain't capitalists, comrade ;D
think positive the entire time, let it sink in..how much are you taking?
That's a classic.
I cannot remember where I saw this additional info with the image, but it said that number is only from events where numbers were given, and events such as the flood had no numbers and thus weren't counted. I almost wish I could be bothered to read through and count myself to check, but I've had enough of the bible, 13 years of a Christian school, I don't recall them ever reading anything about the atrocities in there.  Makes me want to become a teacher, pretend I'm Christian, get a job there then read all the horrible parts, I would love for them to fire me over reading the bible at a Christian school, I would have to create a silo on campus to store the excess irony.
Her atheism is a prop, just like her fake glasses, just like her boob job. Her objectives are to advance the conservative political agenda. Period.
[The Hindenburg disaster](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hindenburg_disaster)  Only to get a high quality rip of OH THE HUMANITY!
The best way to handle any situation is to be relaxed.
Almost as bad as "bitsy"
Son stays after school: "He must be masturbating." Son sick on a school day: "He must be sick of all that masturbating."
Fabulous idea! If I were anywhere near Florida, I would most definitely join you, without question. An excellent and apt expression! Please keep us updated as to what transpires (pics? video?). I would hire body guards, though. Religious "freedom" stops at Islam in 'murica, and the Bible Belters and retired Jews in Florida will want to give you a hiding also.  If you could get just 3 people to do this, maybe they could even dress up like the Pope, an Imam, and a Rabbi (sounds like the start of a good joke, too!).  In any event, it seems the Age of Irrationality is fully upon the US of A; the harbinger of an empire ending.
well, its not quite there.  you could *almost* call this dubstep.
this deserves more upvotes.
No. Chelsea's wedding IS the wedding.
The first "bizarre" stat is that 28% of households have members looking for full-time jobs.  I suppose that includes me, since I loathe my current full-time job.  And if so, it's somewhat misleading as an economic indicator.  It may in-face be indicative of people like me who are pissed at the changes their current employer made to benefits, salary, and work conditions in 2008-2010.
Is there an explicit and preferably standard free license for this?  It looks like good code, but I would not be comfortable just using it because a reddit submission title said I could.  It would be easy to publish it with a simple MIT license, say.
Yeah, and they don't want you returning something expensive that should last a lot longer. If your receipt fades away you probably won't even try. 
BC interior upvote
Be kind, for everyone you meet is fighting a great battle. -- Philo of  Alexandria
upboat for truth
What can I say, the tree was in the way. I love my new Binford lawnmower...
Holy crap.  And here I was only going to be able to offer $2 for one of the figures.  Being broke sucks.
That tree looks like an evolution
I think I've found your problem.
Yes, I will have my computer and our hotel advertised free wifi so we shall see. We should try to at least grab a drink.  A redditor owns a bar and invited me for a drink so maybe we can check that out?
or time travel.
These were your 20s I assume?
Marriage?  No wait, that's that dweam within a dweam.
Might be a little behind the ball but thanks for this link. Brings back many happy memories.
Get off of my lawn!
Without a doubt she takes me to that 'happy place'  Stunning without trying too hard.
I have a self-made one that I use to play system link'd MW2 and GH:Metallica lol :P
Hey man, I have a salt water pool and i'm pretty sure the pool guys who I use are completely full of shit.  Every time I go in, I get a different response from each person as to what exactly I should put into the pool.  Also the computer always says to put something in and most of the time they tell us not to.  Is there any way or are there any questions I can quiz them on to make sure they're legit?
You in Humble Texas, or near it? (New Delorean Company is there)
50 - 60% proves his claim...I know all the weed smokers like to pretend to be high and mighty (pun intended) but you are funding the murder going on in Mexico. 
I am no fan of the recording industry either. I am old enough to have had to replace lots of vinyl albums with CDs. I already owned the licensing rights to the song so I should have gotten the CDs at cost right? No. I am not fooled into thinking that these companies would not screw me over if they had the chance, but file 'sharing' is really just theft. I have no love for the companies that are getting ripped off, but a spade is a spade.
I don't feel as dumb now that I know somebody else does this.
Neil Diamond
Upvote for liking punk rock and using the word "boss" in that context!
I sent an e-mail to an admin asking him for some clarification of a few things.  There was another thread like this a few weeks back, but it looks like they just decided to keep it casual and go through TF2Lobby, so I might try mining that for additional players if more don't come forward in the next day or so.
You assume that the GOP is going to split their votes on issues of principle, yet I've not seen it. As to voting for the man and not the party puts you in the position of someone who would quit his religion because he dislike the preacher? I support the party and the people of that party, not blindly, but because of its' platform, it's principles. And I do use my brain, and that is why I don't vote for an individual who belongs to the Republican Party. They say many wonderful things...they forget those after they get elected more than the Democrats do. Another thing you might consider. In my life I've had a decent Education. I majored in American History. I've never voted Republican because of what I learned.
Her age is relevant here. 
I'm no doubt being stupid here, morning and all, but what the hell are you talking about? Just answer the question please.
no
I was watching The Dog Whisperer and there was a dog named Josh. 
Not the same one, but a few steps up, I had a Casio Data Bank. I thought it was the coolest, could store hundreds of numbers, addresses, etc.... Ahhh life before cell phones....
Yep
or parallel universe.
This almost happened in the this year's WC final
Why the fuck would the response to something being closed because of church be to go to church? Thats stupid. 
The cows have come home to roost.
Rocket is kind of creepy scary.  Cool though!
Oh, sorry. Didn't mean to offend God. My bad.  But if He has the time, it would be great if He could do something about those children. If it's not too much trouble, in His busy schedule. I know how much effort it is to help those who've already helped themselves. Actually helping people who need help is such a bother.
No he is Bruce Banner. 
I'm at the bar right now. I don't see any red backpacks, and minors aren't allowed in this portion, only in the dining area.  Edit: forgot to mention I'm wearing a blue shirt, khaki shorts, and white shoes with red shoelaces.
AustinS, there are quite a few of us that sort by new submissions, you are seen.
Will I need a new graphics card?!?
mountain dew
How do you know? Cause it sounded to me like if they worked they would get out earlier or be paroled sooner. 
**MOVE LEFT!!!!**
http://www.therabbitvibrator.com/
Oh, so no:  **Gave away secret information to Wikileaks.  AMA.**
Ever heard of [Steel Battalion](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Steel_Battalion)? It's probably impossible to get a copy now, but *that* was a hardcore mech sim.
 &gt; People who drive significantly slower than the flow of traffic.  What is with people that insist on going 50-55 when the posted limit is 65? Drives me insane.
I wonder if in the future Macs will have mice with more than one button.  I know, its a crazy idea.
The funniest part about all this is that many of you guys are probably oblivious to the fact that YouTube actually *does* have people that will come out and record you.  YouTube power-user [MrChiCity3 exposed this almost a year ago](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=V0bGs-hhenI), and much of this has been public knowledge for some time.
I drove all the way to Fry's Electronics today without any ID or form of payment. Luckily, my girlfriend wasn't as dumb and now I owe her money. Could have been a complete waste of 3 hours.
Rise of the Triad Shroom Mode 
Some of those nicknames make me want to punch the internet in the balls.   Throwaway, because I don't want the internet punching ME in the balls.
I can get weed and food delivered to me at 3 AM.
Is this a surprise to anyone? His attitude is excellent, also.  We could use more voices like that.
Goddamnit. I work retail.
Honestly Zune's music software rocks.
I love you.
So, *lots of people* listen to his idiotic ranting about women and poor excuse for humor and that's why he should be in the radio HOF?
ಠ_ಠ
I don't want to offend anybody either; but when I observe that their deity is a monster, somebody's not gonna like that. I can't help their reaction. All I can do is be honest about what I think.
I agree with you 100%, and thanks so much for injecting a good idea into this conversation!
Racking up karma on reddit is easy as long as you contribute interesting, relevant posts and avoid terms redditors find offensive such as africoon, ape, ass monkey, ass pirate, ass reamer, banana, bastard, bent, bitch, bluegum, boong, breeder, broad, brownie, butt bandit, butt fucker, cairo coon, camel jockey, camel-fucker, carnie, carpet muncher, cave nigger, cazo, charlie, chink, cholo, chunt, cock sucker, cola, coon, coonass, cracker, crow, cum-dumpster, cum-guzzler, cunt, cunt-eye, dagger, dago, ginzo, derka derka, diaper-head, dickhead, dink, dune coon, dune nigger, dyke, eight ball, faggot, fence-hopper, flamer, fritz, frog, fruit, goat roper, golliwog, gook, goombah, greaseball, greaser, gringo, guido, guinea, gump, half-breed, heeb, hymie, ho, honky, hun, hurammi, jawa, jerry, jib-abdul, jihadi, jim crow, jumping bean, jungle bunny, kaffir, kike, landya, lezbo, limey, pommy, macaca, Manuel labor,  mexcrement, mexi-ho, mexican't, mick, migger, mocha, mosshead, muff diver, muzzie, nancy boy, nigger, nip, oil nigger, pachucho, papa ganoush, peckerwood, pickaninny, pillow-biter, polack, pom, porch monkey, powder burn, puffter, q-tip head, quashie, rag-head, redneck, river-nigger, roach, roundeye, rump ranger, sand kisser, sand nigger, sand rat, sausage jockey, sawney, seppo, sheeny, shit stabber, shylock, sissy boy, sleeper cell, slope, slopehead, slurpee nigger, slut, sodomite, spade, spic, spook, squaw, swisher, taco jockey, tar baby, thicklips, tosser, towl-head, tramp, tranny, uke, uncle tom, vato, wanker, wegro, wetback, whitey, wigger, wog, wop, yank, yid, zeb, Christian values, respecting authority and Republican party.
37 here and this pretty much sums up my belief system.
thank you :)
The lizard brain must be controlled.  In other words: fear, lust, anger, etc, based decisions generally do not lead to the best long term outcome, thus higher brain functions (with the associated capabilities of logic, reasoning, problem solving, proactive thinking, etc) must control the lower brain's baser reactions.
And yesterday this forum mocked Christians for having faith in prayer interceding in medical issues.
If you live in America it costs as much to ship them as it does to buy them but... I totally have the Tenth Doctor version of the Time Squad figures, with sonic screwdriver in hand protecting my Doctor Who book shelf! Also, I just looked over at him right now and noticed he only has four fingers on each hand, wut?! 
I don't know FearGorm, but I will sign your petition if you explain to me why I should.  I do not have time to stalk his profile or anything like that. Since you are clearly passionate about this, you can easily come up with a short statement to explain.
but don't fuck the lawnmower. or at least be careful while doing so.
We're usually in the chairs for at least two hours, and both of the positions that we get in the water are at the end of rotations. Combine that with the fact that we're out in the sun all day and we drink a lot of water, theres usually a pretty urgent need to piss by then. 
It has to do with a bug in the game and the nVidia drivers, more specifically with the shaders. Hopefully this will be fixed soon, but for now playing the Windows version is the best workaround to actually play to your hardware's capability. I actually do this on the 13" MBP on medium and get great framerates. (As a side note, Bootcamp is a nice thing to have anyway for things that come up).  There's more information [here](http://us.battle.net/sc2/en/forum/topic/224842575):  &gt;Right now, the Mac client is seeing some pretty major performance issues due to bugs with both the nVidia graphics drivers in 10.6.4. Snow Leopard, and a bug within Starcraft 2: Wings of Liberty.   &gt;The Shaders, Lighting, Shadow options eat up all of the available video memory, or VRAM, very quickly. This results in the computer paging out to the standard RAM and to the Hard Drive to store the shader details, which is much slower than VRAM. This makes the game slow to a crawl.   &gt;Blizzard, Apple, and nVidia are aware of these two issues, along with others, and are each working on fixes for their respective bugs. 
&gt;I think taking them off the streets where they are far more exposed and putting them in shelters were violence would get you kicked out would help. Are you saying that being placed in a safe environment somehow doesn't make them less likely to die? Are you being serious here?  You can't look at the national murder rate and use it to extrapolate  that it is more dangerous to be a homeless man than a homeless woman.  Shelters for women exist because, in addition to all the issues that the homeless (regardless of gender) have to deal with, homeless women are more likely to be raped or abused.  They're also more likely to be on the streets because they're fleeing a severely abusive partner.  They are the victims of *very specific* types of crime that overwhelmingly come from men. Of course getting people off the streets and away from violence is a good idea, and it's a good idea regardless of gender.  My point is that a *gender specific* shelter for men is not as necessary as one for women because men do not face the same scope of problems, and because women are not the ones making the national murder rate for men so high. &gt;Not counting what you though I said, I never discounted anything nor claimed that the evil 'malicious she-bitch-feminists' conspiracy is responsible. I just pointed out that men are suffering too and it is being almost completely ignored. This to me says that the entirety of society isn't constructed to give privileges to men as the patriarchy theory claims.   The issue here is that you're wrong.  I don't want to minimize the very real male suffering that goes on (e.g. male prison rape) but to use it to draw a conclusion about the entire concept of patriarchy is incredibly shaky logic.  I can't really make you believe in a concept that virtually every single competent theorist or sociologist (or academic in general, really) accepts as truth, but I do want to stress the magnitude of your error.  It's like concluding that we have racial equality in America because white people often get made fun of by black people - it's an absurd conclusion and a ridiculous denial of the many many things that people have written about race relations.  &gt;The problem is that the same thing is not being done for men.  I agree.  I'm reminded of how unfair paternity cases can be when I drive past a "Men's rights law center" every day - I absolutely recognize that there are areas in which men get the short end of the stick.  We also have to register for the draft, and that kinda sucks as well. Ultimately, I just take exception to your denial of the idea that patriarchy plays a role in gender relations in the US.  It's just such an impossibly huge error that I'm not really sure how to address it. 
I want it on a tshirt
This is my guess: the account titling done by Nations bank was done in error due to it being a sole-prop which caused an error in the transition.   We need to dissolve a contract. The most efficient way for this to be conducted is in person. If you do have a disability, the customer service operators may be able to help you; I've never worked in a call center.  Laws change? Yeah, federal regulatory law has changed and so has BofAs willingness to take on any possible liability, such as closing a contract over a phone without proving certainty of the ownership of the account.  Ah, see, BofA wants to become your most used bank. That way, when you are thinking about getting a mortgage you are much more likely to use us. That's where banks make the most money; it's not from consumer deposits.
Not a movie, but: the end of HL2:E2.
I'm amazed this is only mentioned twice in here.   I was almost bawling my eyes out when i watched it. 
thanks for the linky
"I was too lazy to answer it myself."   This gave me a vision of Jabba the hut reading the question on a monitor, looking a the keyboard and then looking away, rolling his eyes.
Still going to open external links in a regular browser though.
Some of us also saw the video in the other ~3 threads linking to it today, but are commenting in this one.
You're right, it is important to take the high road in these types of arguments.  But I think it might be useful when a different point is being made.  I wouldn't use this quote to show: &gt; "Hitler=Bad, Hitler= Catholic, Catholic=Bad". However, it does go against the idea that some people have that "Athiests have a monopoly on evil", or that there is a necessary positive trend between religiosity and goodness.  I guess that's what you were saying about generalizations, but the specificity turns the rhetorical parry into a riposte.  
Unless you tax carbon emissions or do some other kind of market manipulation it is simply not cheaper than coal. On the link you provided you may have not noticed the little asterisk *Production costs do not include indirect costs or capital. Why would they not want to include that? Really you're not going to include capital?! That is one of the major costs of nuclear oh but then their graphs would not look as favorable nuclear.  World-nuclear.org what an unbiased source. 
I'm not totally sure what that means, but congratulations.
I think this is from *Dead Like Me*
This works better with one or two guys, instead of three or four.  It doesn't always work, but it's a polite reminder that it's a game, and harassing teammates won't help them win the game.
Yeah, I just read [the other post](http://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/cvv7t/know_why_we_cant_legalize_filesharing_marijuana/c0voa85) regarding this.  I have worked on campaigns before with voter lists.  I am still mulling this over.  It's an interesting argument.
I'd want a swipe card lock on my house, like those in a hotel.  So if i lost a card I could just reprogram the device and re-image a few blanks
Even though Splice was fucked up, it was probably the best movie theatre experience of my life. Everyone was freaking out and screaming from disbelief, it was so funny.
How bad was it?
make a sacrifice on the alter of 4chan!!!!
You seemed to be asking if you could trace an IP if you had it.  I assumed you meant a CURRENT IP.
I'll refer back to "I just watched it at the right (wrong?) time in my life." Suffice to say, it was a pretty good echo of my life at the time. And, well ... tears were shed.
Don't come to England then; the English language is a dying art here...
Crapware indeed. I moved away from music players for some time and now it feels strange that there needs to be a separate music player as a software.  Why can't people just use any media player that does the same thing albeit not bloated?
It really isn't that difficult to find.  All you need is an almanac, really.  And the writers probably had internet, even back then.   Also, the Simpsons have a ton of sight gags that very few people see.  This isn't a sight gag, of course, but the point is that they put in a lot of effort for little things like these.
Where are you based?  http://techshop.ws/  http://hackerspaces.org/wiki/  http://hackspace.org.uk/
What a buffoon! 
Don't give a fuck.
I don't get it?  Who the fuck is that? (I'm an American so I don't get Aussie humor or what ever point you're trying to make)  P.S.  I didn't read it either, sorry.  I'm not interested in AFL
Kill those who worship the sky god.
Where's Professor?
IMHO [this is the coolest custom EV](http://www.plasmaboyracing.com/whitezombie.php) out there at the moment.  Here's an [interesting video](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1zhKMzMZ_eM) talking about their clever motor design that dynamically switches the motors from serial to parallel in order to essentially swap the huge torque for more horsepower once the car is up to speed.
This freaks everyone out.  That's why people invented heaven.
I see you already have, dimwit.
Jep, that shit happens all the time, especially, like I said above, if you look like a hippy/stoner.   Protip:  We have different kind of police in Spain. Local, Regional, Nacional police and the "Guardia Civil" (something like the National Guard, a almost a para-militar force). While at cities and towns, only National police might bust you ("Policía Nacional", in blue, they look like this:  http://farm3.static.flickr.com/2510/3903843710_6d081844de.jpg http://farm4.static.flickr.com/3383/3523102252_28465bec33.jpg) While on the road, only the "Guardia Civil" (in green) might bust you ( http://tienda.eltallerdelmodelista.com/images/51368_01.jpg http://farm2.static.flickr.com/1354/1180120456_6d2be6a0e1.jpg) The other police forces have other competences and won't raise a finger, other than calling the "right" police.   If you look like somebody who would smoke pot, hide the stuff!
People tend to hate it when you point out the flaws in their arguments.
Awesome but annoying after the first few times.
You're trolling me, right?  That's not how economics works and anybody with the slightest clue knows that.  Seriously, level with me, what's your background in economics?
you are very welcome.
What about Wellington in stead? (depending on what your studying) or Palmerston North. Both better than Hamilton in my opinion. 
Holy fuck, is this already included in PSCS5? I can't find it anywhere...
make a sacrifice on the alter of 4chan!!!!
Between "cold cocks" and "starts to go down on him" I was very confused.
Ouch.  My heart. 
Disregard females, acquire currency
I've watched a "3D TV" (the kind that claim to be 3D without shutter glasses) and they suck.  Everyone looks like they're in front of a green screen. I guess the big difference would be non-shitty colors because you're not looking through red and blue, versus not paying a stupid amount of money for shutter glasses and a high refresh rate TV.
Thank you so much, its downloading right now.  T-minus 8 hours and it's about time. I have played all the Blizzard RTS and got the original WC I soon after release, I am so fucking excited.  I have the funds to purchase so I really hope it runs smoothly at least on the low settings.  
No one has a "right" to not be offended.  That doesn't mean one should go looking for ways to offend others, but I'm certainly not going to worry about whether or not someone gets offended by something I say.  If they don't like it, they can go stick their head in the sand somewhere else.
Me too. 
I think you should discontinue it just because it SEEMS stupid.  I'm all for science, but this one just sounds wrong to me.
Like every other *tray-style* cd drive you mean? I've never seen a slot-loaded cd-drive with a force eject, apple or not.
You don't need to lie. Nobody will ever ask you the question "So the first time you had sex, was it with a hooker?"
Welcome to the club been clean for five years after a two year habit.
Not exactly what you asked but I recently came up with three things I think are key to success...  Passion Preparation Whimsy  I believe applying those principals consistently to anything you love will lead to success.
&gt;Last week, members of the group also protested at pop star Justin Bieber's concert in Kansas City, saying the 16-year-old teaches people to "sin and rebel against God's commandments."  Well, at least there's one thing we can agree on
Some queeny friends of mine have a male cat named Lucy Diamond, because they thought they found a white female adult when in fact it was a white male kitten. He now weighs 25 lbs. I think it borders stupid and fabulous.
What city is this that does its own census?  Is it mandatory?  TIL.  Can't speak about novia scotia, mabye conservatives there really are about reducing government.  Sounds like a cool place if so.
Hopefully the kind that grow super-fast under HID grow lights. I want the tomato(e)s seen in the brocures for hydroponic growing equipment. It's always tomatos. That's what people are growing with that stuff.
Thank you for the explanation.  My wife is now saying "Why would my dad tell me things that aren't true?  He has no reason to lie."  And I tell her he just doesn't know everything.
Be careful with this. More experienced partners know the difference. Men usually become limp after they first get off not still rock hard. Also, they can tell if you "fake" going inside. That stuff does get wet and come out the female... (sorry, not trying to be too explicit here...)  Now, if it's completely dark and you pull out and finish "the fake", you may get away with that one...
I hate chihuahuas. And those minpin things, my sister has one. I hate it with a passion.  Edit: I hate small dogs. They are too needy and yappy.
Well just remember not to bring your axe and the odds will improve immeasurably.
I go every year and have never bothered paying admission. There is no way in hell that I would ever pay that much to get in just so I can shop for action figures in the dealers room. Not to mention the folks they get to run security are a joke and never stop anybody except for girls they want to try and chat up.
And this is why land claim flags were thought up.
I've heard it's better to start a new campaign for Brutal, due to the fact that you apparently need certain upgrades.
Something that I really miss are the dotted borders around links that you click on. Is there an addon for that?
Even better! 
Don't make it full of bullshit stoner clichés.
[Sara Jean Underwood](http://www.google.com/images?q=sara jean underwood), Playboy PMOY in 2007.  Here she is [with freckles](http://www.straitpinkie.com/wp-content/uploads/2009/03/sara-jean-underwood_1-500x665.jpg). Very cute.
Who else did a search for their dog's name to see if it had been listed?
Don't bury the lead. Like you did in your headline.
Not slower than the flow, but too close to the car in front of them. That's the main cause.  There were some animations I saw years back that modelled it. I'm sure it's still out there somewhere.  Anyway, what happens is when people are following too close it forces them to have exaggerated reactions to the changes in speed of the car in front of them. They will accelerate rapidly to close the gap, and they will brake rapidly to avoid hitting the car in front when it stops. This inconsistent movement then gets exaggerated by the car behind them, and the next, and next.  The way to stop the wave is to put more distance between you and the car in front so that you don't have to react directly to their speed changes. If you ever get caught in one of these waves, when you see it ahead of you make sure you have adequate distance between you and the car in front, reduce your speed *before* you arrive at the jam in an even, consistent manner, and approach the jam gradually. By the time you arrive at the jam it will possibly have eased and you won't have to stop. Your more even movements will be reflected in the car behind you, potentially ending the jam.  After seeing the animation of this technique I've tried it lots of times in real life, and g'damn it, it works. If traffic is snarled up and going stop and start, then leave a bigger gap between the car in front and make your speed changes as even and smooth as possible, and you'll be the guy who fixes it all.
I say fuck "them" 
[](/fy1 "PERSONAL RESPONSIBILITY YEAH")
Where do you acquire these houses to sell?
Good shot but you shouldn't wank in the shower, it clogs the drain.
I'm 38 and I had a slide rule 
Bring dressing.
Yeah, y'know what would be a great idea?  Selling a book about getting laid in honor of those people that have contracted a deadly SEXUALLY TRANSMITTED DISEASE. Have you no soul?
And cocaine.
Not all road restrictions and laws apply to cyclists.
You may be one of the fortunate few for whom simply cutting calories will work, but if not, you can go low carb without going to the extreme of a no-carb/keto diet, which may not work as quickly, but may be a lot more maintainable for you. Cut it back to 1 serving a day and make it whole grain.   These videos (recommended to me by sprondonacles) will completely change the way you think about carbs: http://journal.crossfit.com/2010/04/insulin-body-weight-and-energy-production.tpl  They were a big eye-opener that really helped me find the willpower/motivation to cut back.  Sure, carbs are yummy, but really, they're just not worth it. There's plenty of other yummy food out there. Find a low-carb cookbook and start experimenting.  My daily meals now consist of eggs for breakfast, turkey or tuna, raw veggies and a piece of cheese for lunch, 4oz of milk and some nuts for an afternoon snack, and dinner is a steamed green veggie, chicken, beef, or pork, and one carb, whether that's bread, potato, or corn. I find that if I eat the carb serving with dinner, instead of earlier in the day, I don't get the late-night munchies.
Yeah, that video really shocked me. And it's pure slave labor. 
The person I go down on smells and tastes fuckin awesome. 
No one wants to play god? Weird.
FYI, you should take up aquaculture/aquaponics/aquaria-whatever.  Your knowledge will fit right in, and you'll also add quite a bit more knowledge to your toolkit.  BTW, I don't know who came up with the idea of salt water pools being easier, but that's total bunk.  Maybe initially easier, but in the long run just as hard or more so.  More heavy metals and other chemistry to be concerned about, let alone the corrosion issues and disposing of waste backflush.
It's something I learnt elsewhere, but I'm going to quote Kreia here, since it sounds so much cooler. (especially read in her voice).   Distrust is an effective shield, and should be carried always.
I wouldn't say it's 'shitty' advice.  Six pack and half pint IS less then what she's doing now.  What I was getting at is she's obviously not letting the alcohol totally sink in before downing another beer, hence passing out.  The liqour is meant to get her there quicker so she doesn't down beer all night.  Then of course, cut it out completely.
Wow.  You really are an idiot.  They did the same thing for Bush.  Do you think that one wasn't neutral too?  Give me an example of why it's not neutral.
No biology book I've ever read even uses the terms micro/macro in accordance with evolution.
Ahh, good catch sir.  
Keys, wallet, phone, pen.  The tricky thing is figuring out which of my two pockets to put my keys in. They won't fit with my wallet, and they'll scratch my phone screen.
upvoted for Aquabats!
monkspider
as long as the other person has bought the game and has an account, they can play it anywhere.  So yes.
delete your system32 folder, it works every time
Kiddie porn is just some conservative, tough-on-crime-boogie man. As far as I can tell the worst offenders are the people who are crusading against it.   Just don't suck up all my bandwidth or you will get kittie-porn.
The speech input device is really dirty!
Even still, if a person was perfectly maintaining 28kph, then the entire circle would move at that lower speed.  That is, the circle should be limited by the speed of its slowest participant.  That alone doesn't predict any kind of clumping or slowing to 0kph, you need something else (e.g. the stupid driver theory) to explain it.
thanks for this! regextest.app has been crashing a lot for me.
She's got cut marks in her stomach, which look self inflicted. I try to avoid sticking it in crazy, so let's stick with smoking.
Notice the theme in Nintendo games? Link is always trying to get a kiss.  Even after all that shit he's been through, he never made it past first base.
Question; Instead of relying on n^2 players to show up, why not do swiss draw with a top-8 cutoff?
I was 19 (a long time ago) and met this very hot chick (same age) in a course we were doing together. Beautiful, demure, intelligent, funny. Somehow, we got along really well. Just 'clicked,' y'know? Over a period of weeks I eventually worked up the courage to ask her out. She got very quiet, then, with tears welling up in her eyes, told me, "My religion won't allow it." End of story. She left the course the next day. Never saw her again. Of course, I have no idea what her religion was. Whatever, it wouldn't allow relationships outside it.
Web has made numerous things simpler to do. It can make individuals connected to everything all over the world. Numerous individuals use the web to shop around. Even to obtain quotes of car insurance coverage businesses, make comparisons, and purchase policy on the internet. It has been the fastest way to obtain insurance coverage and make them simple to take their choice to purchase policies. Web also offers numerous car insurance coverage businesses. Numerous car insurance coverage businesses have web sites and tools so that you can make buyers simple to obtain instant quotes according to their driving needs. Even for individuals who are difficult to insure, have traffic accidents, or violations, they're still simple to gain quotes, make comparison in between a number of businesses and take a choice. Car insurance coverage businesses might operate and insure individuals using the same principles. Actually, most of them apply numerous rates and coverage. That's why producing comparison is required. By producing the comparisons in between the car insurance coverage businesses which are obtainable, individuals enabled to obtain high quality coverage and competitive rates. You will find also some benefits of purchasing policy on the internet with car insurance coverage businesses. They have total self serving web sites for their clients to manage their accounts totally. This will provide choices and convenience twenty four hours a day. An additional advantage of purchasing policy on the internet is that they are able to make changes whenever they require to. They are able to add new drivers, take drivers off from the policy, or alter their address if they move and numerous others. Car insurance coverage businesses on the internet also permit the buyers to alter their deductibles simply. They are able to also alter the coverage or add other optional choices for example roadside assistance and car rental using the policy. Even to set up payment alerts to prevent from being late in paying the premium. Purchasing and managing account on the internet with car insurance businesses is really a great choice.
Dogs come in to my parents very sick from chocolate all the time. But there are plenty of cases where the dog makes it, and even a few where they show no ill effects.  One dog came in that ate an entire 3lb box of hershey's chocolate bars. The owners didn't discover this until a few hours after the event, and it took them 30 minutes to get to the office. My mom brought him into the back yard and gave him ipecac. I wish we'd taken a picture of the aftermath.  They monitored him for 24 hours at the owner's request, but they really didn't think it necessary. The dog was fine (other than drinking massive amounts of water and throwing up again about an hour later).  I also have a friend with a very (behaviorally) strange husky-mix. After a party one of their cats knocked over a bag of reeses cups. The dog ate them all (probably around 50) - amazingly, not including the wrappers. They discovered the mess the next morning and the dog was completely fine.  That being said, *immediately* get in touch with a Vet if your dog eats chocolate. The two stories I have are examples of lucky situations. There are plenty of terrible ones I could share as well.
E.T. the extra terrestrial: E.T. is found lying in the river, sick... and from there on...  :_(
SOMETHING IN FRIDGE SMELLS  USE MOUTH TO BREATHE
You sold my dead bird to a blind kid?
Or so you'd like us to believe, sir.
Happy Birthday to you  Happy Birthday to you,  Happy Birthday dear (name)  Happy Birthday to you  ~ ~ ~ ~ ~  Happy Birthday to you,  Squashed tomatoes and stew.  Bread and water in the gutter,  Happy Birthday to you.  ~ ~ ~ ~ ~  Happy birthday to you,  You live in a zoo  You look like a monkey (scratch arm pits)  Happy Birthday to you  (It took me like 1 min or so)
I also do this periodically throughout the day.
Grand Theft Auto + The Sims
If you do more in your life than seth rogen did in his, I will happily eat my words. Also, I wouldn't say his movies are centered around dick jokes. 
Bryllup fra Dansk tv site om bryllup og bryllupsplanlægning. Se tv om alt til dit ejet smukke drømmebryllup. Læs Louises ugentlige bryllupsblog og find inspiration til dit ejet bryllup. Bryllupsforum, video og bryllupsshop gør Bryllupskanalen til Danmarks førende bryllupssite.  Gør som tusindevis af andre kommende brudepar. Besøg Bryllupskanalen og find inspiration til dit bryllup
This is a nice tool - I love simulations like this.  It's not just about the down force on the front wing though. When the ends of the wing curve down like the Red Bulls, it channels more air under the car and over the defuser improving rear down force as well.
I don't think that's the end with the eyes.
I don't mind kissing girls wearing lipstick, but who powders their lips?  LOL...!
Don't feed the troll! 
Right on, brother ...
I see a baboon.
Don't know where you're based but any school I've worked in wouldn't take the risk - you wouldn't be covered by their insurance etc...
I hope it's me!!!
I was under the  impression that the lower pH potentiated the effect of the chlorine (because apparently the active oxidizer is hypochlorous acid and not the hypochlorite anion)
[I win?](http://robinwords.com/game/wordlist.js)
Do you publish regular newsletters?  I would like to subscribe.
[This](http://mash.myshopify.com/collections/all/products/mp3-player) has always appealed to me, but if I'm gonna spend $150 bucks on something for my bike it's probably not going to be a speaker.
BLAST IT WITH PISS
You can suck my Reagan and my two hairy Bushes bitch. 
"Chell." Frozen in time for a few centuries and then forced to solve puzzles designed by something she already killed?  Forced to incinerate her only friend?  All for the false hope of cake?
I read this with Rorschachs voice.  
yeah, and if somehow one of them ends up in the wrong pocket, you're momentarily confused and/or panicked (where are my keys??? WTF is in my right pocket where my phone should be?! ... oh, my keys.)
Seriously fox news conservatives fuck right off! Take your "us against them" attitude and go form an anti-socialism reddit or something - but get a fucking life!
EVE Online?
Mail clients are very primative and thus much CSS doesn't work. You will need to work out what doesnt work. I can suggest as tehtooya suggests which is forget DIVs and forget css inthe header (gmail doesnt render it).  Keep the email layout VERY simple. Ie a table, with max two columns and a header graphic.  outlook 2000 and outlook 98 render the same email diferrently.  TEST the email in these email browsers: Outlook 2000, Outlook 98, Gmail, Yahoo, Hotmail, Thunderbird A google search should enable you to find a tool that does this easily.  Be prepared to fight with Designers when they design an awesome newsletter that cannot be rendered correctly on all email programs.  Good luck!
Try replacing a meal with a pill of Lysergic acid diethylamide. There is a 50% chance you will have a flying car or else be set upon by demons.
I didn't suggest a price. The person above me compared a $5k MBP to a $1k thinkpad. I said that was outrageous. You retorted that a top-of-the-line MBP is only $3.7k, intending to discredit my statement.   However, my statement was that nobody pays $5k for an MBP and that the comparison being made to thinkpads was erroneous. Since you attacked that statement, I provided an equally specced thinkpad which costs *more* than the MBP you listed.  Also, Lenovo wanted $500 to upgrade from 2GB to 8GB. Apple charges $400 to upgrade from 4GB to 8GB. Lots of companies pull the "let us upgrade your RAM for way too much money" card.
&gt;A total of 4.6 billion isk destroyed at a rate of more than 230 mil   Ouch.
That is basically what I clicked the link to find out.
All of your Starcraft 2 data is stored on Battle.net, and my brother can log into my account and continue right where I left off.
I think it usually tastes like the ocean smells.
Anybody got a peanut?
What sort of diet have you been providing for her?
Haha, same thing happened to me, I grabbed this pipe flavoring and dripped it in both eyes, then screamed. I rinsed my eyes for the duration of my high.
+1 for Isaac Clarke.  Being stuck alone fighting mutant space zombies when you were just there to fix some stuff has to ruin your day.
she ain't got nothin on the 17 year old girl selling sweet corn by the side of the road in my town...not even close
Everyone knows there is life (they're alive). We're talking about extra-terrestrial life, and nobody knows whether there is or not, hence this thread.
I saw that outside at a drive in. It was fucking beautiful and sad at the same time...
I hope there's more to life than that. Both those scenarios suck.
I thought it was more like a mind dry hump.
What denomination of church? What kind of work do you do? Do you attend any of the weekly services? How does the staff treat you / do they know you're an atheist?
Firefly and Serenity had Shepherd Book, but there were questions about his past that were never answered.
We once left a window unlocked and came home to see all of our expensive stuff was gone.  We locked all of the doors, but accidentally left one window unlocked and the guy came in, opened our doors, and stole our stuff in under 45 minutes.  They don't want to break windows because it's loud, messy, and more likely to grab the neighbor's attention.  If they can get in without breaking anything, they have the highest chance of success.  Locking a glass door will probably deter most criminals, unless they REALLY want to get in.
'ey look at me, im on wall street and shit'
It might be hard to find, but I recommend 'Summer Heights High' to anybody who asks for a T.V show recommendation.   It's a mockumentary about high school life in Australia, where this Australian comic actor plays 3 different characters in the school. It was really popular here in Australia and apparently it's getting some recognition in the States, etc. 
vacuuming before the cleaning lady comes is madness.  what are you paying her for if you are already doing the cleaning.
Thanks. Australian, actually. Rebates, WTF? Checking now.  Thanks for the info. About a week ago I felt certain about getting one 5850 now and another later for CF, but now I feel completely lost. I had a brief window in which purchasing PC hardware felt straightforward and logical. I missed that window, and now I'm left in that no-man's-land of "what's the point, it's all outdated in a few months, and you need to get four of the best card running in SLI/CF just to run current gen games at 60 FPS."
Was 5, with the 7 year old neighbor girl in my back yard. 
-ELANOM-  Wooo cancer, woooooo!  \m/
You could get some hot swap cages to put in the 5.25" slots, like these: http://www.newegg.com/Product/ProductList.aspx?Submit=ENE&amp;N=40000043&amp;IsNodeId=1  Most have built-in fans.  [This](http://www.newegg.com/Product/Product.aspx?Item=N82E16817993002) one, in particular, looks like a great mix of low price + good cooling + decent quality. It's not hot swap, but it doesn't sound like that matters to you.
Every time I've given head I've considered it an amazing experience.  You'd think my brain specifically evolved just to go crazy in response to that aroma.  Stephen Jay Gould, the late biologist, referred to vaginal deodorants as the most useless thing ever invented.  I've never been with a woman who used one, and I can't imagine anything you might put in a spray can which would be an improvement at all.
Princess Bride
That's actually simple - the image you see during the 15 seconds is the negative of the colored version. You stare it for a long enough time, the photoreceptive cells in your eye (and the neuronal machinery in the retina) start to adjust and consider that the background color (like burn-in in CRTs and old Plasma screens), essentially shifting the local white point to the color of the original image. Image is replaced with the B/W version, and your eye then thinks there's color there.
Yahoo Answers now has more trolls than legitimate questions. I still don't understand how they are so effective.
Just like the freshies off the super-jib in tahoe brah. tube city. 
That is just wrong. And if it is happening it is because it's profitable for someone. 
Steve Ballmer? 
I have lost my keys and I did change the locks on my home...  But I had been carrying 3 different keys (One for the garage, one for the front door and one for the side door) that I inherited from the original owners.  Knowing that I could re-key the locks so they all opened to one key, I'd been planning to do so but kept putting it off.  So losing my keys was the motivator to actually do it, and replace 3 keys with one.
Crash. The one David Cronenberg made in 1996, not the stupid one that won an Oscar. It's about people who get off on car crashes. It's about people who think manged bodies are hot. There is wound fucking.
[this stuff](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8r1CZTLk-Gk)?
reply expanding on your thought and offering further thoughts regarding the original post
Sneak King looks like he's not allowed within 500 metres of any school, public bathroom or restaurant. When he enters the room on To Catch a Predator, he's got a burger in one hand and his nads in the other. Sneak King slips his date rohypnol just so that he can cut off their oxygen every minute or two. Sneak King is not allowed to babysit.
Wait.   There are African French people in France?
I always thought people went to the Grand Canyon to stand on the edge and yell "echo." Didn't know there was more to do.
yeh ive seen somers town, really good. A room for Romeo Brass is also top quality.  Apparently some think its not as good as his other stuff but i dont agree, top notch.  I might also recommend 'My Summer of Love' to you, not Shane Meddows but just as good.
Are you cutting donations off the top or speaking as god on a loudspeaker when people are praying alone and convincing them that they are following the wrong faith?
I lol'ed so hard.
&gt;Every place I DJ we pay a fee for music licensing rights that is set by the ASCAP.  Why should you have to pay a company that didn't produce the music and wasn't involved in its creation, for the right to play a CD that you have already purchased?   Can't you see how stupid that is? 
There are ex-AQUA fans who realized they were listening to bad music all those years. perhaps. 
Good stuff! I have a bar in my door frame, and it's amazing how fast I have progressed from 5 to 20+ pullups in a go... Next step is to add weight, anyone have a method of doing this that doesn't involve a harness?
ST version had better music, graphics seemed to be identical from what I can tell, seems like they'd be hard to recreate at a slightly higher res.
Do you want all the colours in one cake, or 2 layers or will each layer be a different colour?
I'm almost there!!
He eats doggie kibble, with the occasional people food. He loves to eat poop; he goes bobbing for shittles in the cats' litterbox whenever he can.
and intelligent is not the same as technology advanced. Dolphins are intelligent they are self aware and have an idea of identiy
always sunny in philadelphia. funny as hell. its a different storyline each show and is just about the stupid shit they come up with and do in their daily lives.
I'm already watching True Blood.  That's a given. :-)  Any self respecting good TV lover wouldn't miss it :).  I've also watched The Wire, The Sopranos, Oz, Dexter, Six Feet Under, Nurse Jackie, and Dollhouse.  I feel like I've hit the end of good TV...
Actually yes, there are ridings that are split between the NDP and conservative parties because in rural areas there's a lot of competition between these two factions in terms of representing rural interests.  I don't know much about quebecois politics(hell...I barely know anything about *fransaskois* politics).  It might be the norm in canadian politics but yes, I do think it is a dangerous thing.  *especially* a conservative majority, I have only lived at least through one of those, and that was enough for one lifetime for someone who cares about his co.  But we are agreeing on the part about how pathetic and frustrating the whole thing has become.
I was talking more about personal computers not servers. Have an upvote anyway since there's a downvote Nazi here somewhere.
I always do this.  When I go to work I have a four pocket check because my punch in badge is in the lower-side pocket on my Dickies.  
do they wash your dishes? i'd hire someone just to wash my dishes.
Sorry, misinterpreted your tone. Thought you were trying to make me look a fool.  Joke Explanation: My original statement was that Palestine will soon be added to the **Landlocked by a Single Country List** in that Wikipedia article. Palestine's land loss progression would indicate that it will eventually be enclosed by Israel. I.e. nothing to do with being landlocked by other landlocked countries.
I second this. Just do the deed, it's not a big deal, no one else has to know. In these types of threads people are always saying how it's not a big deal to be a virgin at 23 and blah blah blah, but if it is bothering you then it is a problem. 
WORKOUT DVDS! Bellydancing (with Veena and Neena) and Carmen Electra's Aerobic Striptease. They're awesome, not too strenuous but definately effective and my fav part, can be done in front of the tv.
Best post here...
PST here. I main soldier and can play engie (useful on Gravelpit competitions) and can play scout too if needed. In fact, I mained scout for a while before discovering the joys of soldier. I'm not bad at demo either.  Go ahead and add me on Steam if you wish. My ID is desperatechaos.  P.S. I've played with DashTwelve before and can verify that he's good. But it's been a while since I last played him, so I don't remember too much. :P  As for team name, I'd recommend keeping it to one or two words that sound cool. Complexity and Blight are good examples.
who's to say that there wasn't a better way of doing those things? without a free market for what the public sector provides, you can never see what the private sector could offer.
Talk to magistrate and see about diversion of some kind. If fee is the problem, I am sorry, it will most likely be the cheapest way out.  I have to say it: Do not drink till you are legal if you can not deal with the consequences.
"Yes, well. When I see five weirdos dressed in togas stabbing a guy in the middle of the park in plain view of a hundred people, I shoot the bastards, that's my policy."
Very true.
Who took the pictures?
Stretch marks?
Well said.
Haha nice one. He/she seems to rip on peoples intelligence a lot. Maybe someone is a little insecure...
Caught in a landslide...
I brought up the Nuremberg trial to demonstrate that one is responsible for hie or her orders, including Mullen. My statement wasn't about punishment, it was about responsibility. 
Haven't learned it all yet.
using whatever comes to hand
&gt; Nekromantik. A German film about love.  ftfy
&gt; 100 years from now, they'll be saying the same thing about us.  It's on [XKCD](http://xkcd.com/771/) so it must be true! :-)
Taking a paper towel and lighting in on fire and just looking at it while I was holding it.
Buy obeying the law I am supporting what infrastructure? The ones the recording artists decide to join? Listen to your argument. Any artist is free to tell the recording companies to go shit in their hat and give their music away online, but the fact is, the labels give something that the Internet cannot (at least not yet): Promotion. 5% of a million CDs sold is still more than 0% of 200 CD's downloaded. Do you really think Eminem would be Eminem if he ran that shit out of his basement?
&gt;I'd like to have him alone in a room for an hour.  You're supposed to punish him, not pleasure him.
If he's good looking I'll let him sniff them sober :-)
I'm just glad I didn't come from the generation known as the 'me' generation. Talk about selfish.
The biggest revelation I've ever had in my life, where losing weight is concerned, is that it's *ok* to feel hungry. For me, realizing this was the first step that's helped me to cope with cutting back on food intake.  The next best thing that I can suggest that has worked well for me, is to start off easy. Sure, working out hard will show you some big losses, but if you already hate working out on Day Two, what chance do you have of continuing?  Personally I prefer riding a stationary bike because it's low-impact and if you're not in running shape it's so much less of a soul-sucker. Plus, if you have an *actual* bike, going on short rides can be fun, which makes losing weight a lot easier. 
Sounds like a plan. Going to shower (again) and put my game face on. Bitches won't know what hit 'em!
Apropos Chrome... oftentimes I enter something like "imdb [some movie]" into the address bar which gets me to the google search. Is there something that redirects me to the first search result automatically as this is almost always the one I want? ctrl+enter would be nice.  Edit: [nevermind](http://blog.stevehorn.cc/2009/02/google-chrome-feeling-lucky-search.html)
I hope he's a Redditor.
How cheap are you looking guitar-wise? I recommend an Epi LP Standard for value. I got a used one for like $150 a few years ago.
Ya there used to be this website where you'd comment on posts. ... 
Allen Carr's Easy Way to Stop Smoking.  I read this book eight weeks ago, just for a laugh and have not smoked a cigarette since. It's a little bit cheesy, but I haven't smoked and don't miss it! I failed every other time I tried. I'm so grateful - I think it saved my life.
Do you take vitamin c? You don't want to get scurvy.
If you haven't seen the Koreeda film "Dare Mo Shiranai" / "Nobody Knows" you'll probably need your sadness-in-film setting recalibrated. And it's based on a true story too. 
In a specific window of time, of 2-3 years which most of those episodes are, far more than 5%. Anywhere from 100% to 25-33%.  However what those examples show is CORRUPTION and lack of ETHICAL behaviour. It shows a PATTERN of behaviour that leads to accumulating of personal wealth at the cost of corporate or public wealth. Basically, those people benefit by stealing from the company or public purse. As their skill grow and they get more powerful in life due to wealth, age and experience, their thieving will grow too.  At the extreme, I urge you to watch the GS Senate hearings. The GS executives portray themselves as an extreme example of soul-less, unethical, greedy people I have ever encountered.
http://github.com/petsagouris/php-utf8
Shouldn't it be: I heard you liked landlocked countries so I locked a landlocked country inside of your landlocked countries.  I don't think your start has an end.
I use javascript to do the actual submit (not an input of type submit).  On submission, I disable the submit button so that it can't be clicked again.   Since the form is submitted via a javascript function (ie, ajax), reloading the page won't send the form a second time, either.  I also don't commit whatever the form data is until the callback function sends a signal that the user interface has been updated to reflect the submission.
We've adopted the German terms, and they are what's commonly used.
"No... you're right, Ed. A parachute not opening... that's a way to die. Getting caught in the gears of a combine... having your nuts bit off by a Laplander, that's the way I wanna go!"
Um, Mt. Fuji usually has a white peak...could you handle giving us another peek?
Kinda. I use backtype to send me alerts about my name and username so I don't miss any chances to read feedback or do customer service.
Loaded comment.. you make it seem like OUR government imprisons people regularly without due process, meaning trial by jury or judge... a form of checks and balances our country was founded on. I'm not a fan of the patriot act but that's not what this discussion is about.  I am a fan of the constitution and net neutrality - A DATA NEUTRAL INTERNET - is well in line not only with how the internet was created but also in line with the 1st amendment. It reinforces our rights.. not takes them away. There is a difference.  Drawing on your imprisonment idea... do you know how big the private prison industry is in America?   http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Private_prison#Development_of_private_prisons_in_the_United_States  Did you ever hear of that judge who got kick backs from a private company for jailing juveniles?   "Judges Plead Guilty in Scheme to Jail Youths for Profit"  http://www.nytimes.com/2009/02/13/us/13judge.html  Think about the amount of money being made by existing well established companies who have the money and resources to lobby and influence the government (as well as you ore me via advertising and misinformation) to keep their policies the same for their profit. While the prison industry in my opinion is not a great example it is an example that shows what industries will do to try to influence government for profit.   Passing legislation with the concepts of net neutrality in it will prevent companies from stifling free speech,  and information on the internet. The battle isn't over once its passed.. we need to keep standing up for our rights.. I'm sure there will be attempts to weaken the bill both before (maybe even by passing a bill named net neutrality but really allowing corporations to do what they want) and after its passed by repealing or weakening its provisions.
ihop and baskin robbins are shit
[Deadwood](http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0348914/) is a pretty good example of what a Libertarian society would look like.  No taxes, right to bear arms, unrestrained private enterprise, monetary system based on Gold - Utopia!
What about BlackBerry? or do you think there shouldn't be any products with Black in them?  Also: http://thegrammarvandal.wordpress.com/2007/09/05/i-couldnt-care-less-correct/
So u get Limo's and music in room 1.  what next double cheese weekends
&gt;Shut the fuck up with your bullshit, seriously. Son? I'm probably older than you are, child.  You mad, big guy?  You need a tissue, son?  &gt;Like has been said elsewhere, YOU don't fucking know why they have their handicap plates. You have no fucking idea! They're fat and you jump to conclusions. Did you check their medical history? No, you didn't.  Again, you need a tissue?  You're really getting mad there, chief.  Don't get your carpet wet with all those tears.  &gt;I'm sure, you just scout around town collecting data about how many apparently overweight people you see at various restaurants.  Nope, I just happen to actually leave my place every once in a while and see what happens in the world around me (unlike you).  You still haven't given me a good explanation as to why these people deserve a placard when they can walk for hours just fine.  Let me guess...you're a fat fuck too, and you can't stand it?  Even if you aren't, you're really one dumb motherfucker.
Internet miscommunication at its finest. Cheers.
Some of them don't exactly look like kings.
Is it correct that the 12-step programme asks you to give yourself over to a higher power as part of recovery?
la Mamma Morta from "Philadelphia".  I cry through the entire thing.  Watching his face...the thought of it makes me cry.
If I notice my broadband getting slowed down, then I will throttle it.
Wow. I'm kind of repulsed. Sorry.
Awesome made-in-Canada original designed and all natural clothing for babies...
Driving on the freeway, someone throwing themselves off an overpass and landing on a car a few cars in front of me..  I had a hard time sleeping for a few nights, I can only imagine how the guy driving the car still feels today.
That is actually a serpent wrapped around the staff of Asclepius, one of Apollo's sons who supposedly practiced medicine (Greek mythology). For the truly nerdy - there is a great explanation of the history of medicine (including Asclepius and John Hunter, who was mentioned above) in a [this course](http://www.thegreatcourses.com/tgc/courses/course_detail.aspx?cid=8128) made by The Great Courses. 
You completely misunderstand the argument in question. If I spend a hundred million dollars coming up with a sentence, I have no right to prevent you from repeating it, whether or not I ever make up my costs.   We've decided, through law, that a book should be different.  That's fine, but these restrictions but be individually justified.  Most copyright extension supporters have lost the ability to argue logically in favor of their positions, resorting instead to "our position is morally right and advances society because.. our position is morally right and advances society."
Yeah, So its stretched a little on my screen. Tried to resubmit it in a better size, but I have been posting to fast apparently so sorry about that.
Here's the approach I've taken to get established and for PvP; this will probably better serve the super newblets than you. I'm a very inexperienced EvE player and I mostly don't know what I'm doing(very low operating ISK too). So, I got all my learning skills to IV. I'm currently getting all the tackling skills to IV so I can quickly get points on enemy ships and avoid getting popped; I've been improving! I didn't lose my frigate the last fleet op which saw a lot of action.  From here I'll be training for a Drake. Very inexpensive. Requires a small skill set to function, can serve as heavy tackle, functions great for ratting or mission running and you wont be a primary target in fleet ops unless the opponent knows what their doing. As a Goonie recently wrote, it's EvE's "miracle ship". The ship seems to be very forgiving and a great platform to learn EvE's mechanics from.  From here I'll probably move towards improving Drones. I love me some drones. Followed by training for a frigate sized ship that can hold 5 of them. ;) I also love lasers and over tanked ships. So who knows what lies ahead.
LIKE A BOSS!
Had two hamsters, named them Bill and Hillary Clinton.
I didn't love Dungeon Siege, as it was a railroad game.
Halada's Mining Guide v3.0 Extended Edition is all you really need.
I had a dwarf go bezerk, smash the bridge he was currently standing on, and fall 7 z levels to his death. The bridge was pointless anyways, so I never reconstructed it. :)
Sounds like you've got everything under control. Without going into detail, is it helping?
Oh fucking awesome.  I'm starting SG-1 tonight.  Thank you!
This material was classified Secret, the lowest classification in the American system.  If Mullen cared about his Afghan snitches so much, he wouldn't be classifying their full names, full names of their fathers, tribal affiliations, and GPS coordinates, as only Secret -- which any soldier with the slightest security clearance can access in full.
lol dongs
The point is ... if you use British English the stat is false. If you use American English, the stat is false.   QI gets it wrong quite often ... still love the show, though. 
He was the best character in the movie. If you watch the special features, his improv is way better than Seth Rogan's.
V for Vendetta!
This game gave me my standard response to someone asking if I mind if they drive. ("Just as long as you don't mind me clawing at the dash and shrieking like a cheerleader.")
It is just a technical matter, the Obama administration says: We just need to make a slight change in a law to make clear that we have the right to see the names of anyone’s e-mail correspondents and their Web browsing history without the messy complication of asking a judge for permission. It is far more than a technical change. The administration’s request, reported Thursday in The Washington Post, is an unnecessary and disappointing step backward toward more intrusive surveillance from a president who promised something very different during the 2008 campaign. In a 1993 update to the Electronic Communications Privacy Act, Congress said that Internet service providers have to turn over to the F.B.I., on request, “electronic communication transactional records.” The government says this includes the e-mail records of their subscribers, specifically the addresses to which e-mail messages were sent, and the times and dates. (The content of the messages can remain private.) It may also include Web browsing records. To get this information, the F.B.I. simply has to ask for it in the form of a national security letter, which is an administrative request that does not require a judge’s signature.  But there was an inconsistency in the writing of the 1993 law. One section said that Internet providers had to turn over this information, but the next section, which specified what the F.B.I. could request, left out electronic communication records. In 2008, the Justice Department’s Office of Legal Counsel issued an opinion saying this discrepancy meant the F.B.I. could no longer ask for the information. Many Internet providers stopped turning it over. Now the Obama administration has asked Congress to make clear that the F.B.I. can ask for it. These national security letters are the same vehicles that the Bush administration used after the Sept. 11, 2001, attacks to demand that libraries turn over the names of books that people had checked out. The F.B.I. used these letters hundreds of thousands of times to demand records of phone calls and other communications, and the Pentagon used them to get records from banks and consumer credit agencies. Internal investigations of both agencies found widespread misuse of the power, and little oversight into how it was wielded.  President Obama campaigned for office on an explicit promise to rein in these abuses. “There is no reason we cannot fight terrorism while maintaining our civil liberties,” his campaign wrote in a 2008 position paper. “As president, Barack Obama would revisit the Patriot Act to ensure that there is real and robust oversight of tools like National Security Letters, sneak-and-peek searches, and the use of the material witness provision.” Combined with his recent sex scandal, liberals are not amused. Where is the “robust oversight” that voters were promised? Earlier this year, the administration successfully pushed for crucial provisions of the Patriot Act to be renewed for another year without changing a word. Voters had every right to expect the president would roll back authority that had been clearly abused, like national security letters. But instead of implementing reasonable civil liberties protections, like taking requests for e-mail surveillance before a judge, the administration is proposing changes to the law that would allow huge numbers of new electronic communications to be examined with no judicial oversight.  Democrats in Congress can remind Mr. Obama of his campaign promises by refusing this request.   
Yeah, Ronald is great. I have both his albums. Buy them. http://www.ronaldjenkees.com/
FAP FAP
There are none. He's an idiot.
it really is an amazing experience to be there, to help other people demonstrate their love in such a way. It really is wonderful. I am so happy that you too have had this experience!
I'm just saying, if you want to get shit off your chest, you might as well go all the way, take no prisoners. They wouldn't have any mercy towards you if you were a gay couple trying to get married, or a 14 year old girl who was raped by her own father and is now being forced to have the child, so you should make sure someone is crying when your done because that's what they do to people every day by forcing their beliefs on others.
Wow, this is incredible; thanks so much for submitting it!  Where can I find more music this good?
@inabook  "In my daily life, I see very little interest from men in any men's rights issues. When I've discussed these issues with male friends, they find most of them the be silly or irrelevant to them."  Have you asked them how it felt to have to register for the draft? Have you asked them if they're circumcised, and if so how it feels to have been denied the protections to genital mutilation that women enjoy? Maybe they'll find their safety and sexual health to relevant and pertinent to them. 
my ex-girlfriend laughed at me when i cried at the end of my dog skip  :(
Shitty beef
Fenton Corvald Caninus
Well, here's the thing:  You have $100 to spend, but that ain't much in the bike world.  Cancel out anything new, because anything for that amount will be garbage.  Next, get a rough ballpark of your size.  .I am 5'11'' / 180 cm.  I ride a 19" - 20" mt. bike and a 57cm road bike.  Buying anything too small or large for you would be a waste. That should narrow you down. You want to have enough stand over height to save your parts yet not so short it's uncomfortable to ride.  Post your size, etc.  Brands such as RoadMaster, Columbia, NEXT, Murray, Mongoose, or anything you find in a department store shouldn't be purchased used. They're bad enough when they're new, but they're basically disposable bikes to begin with. Don't waste money on cheap bikes with cheap front suspension.  Steel bikes may present more value. (Long story...)  Fuji Sports 10 / 12 : Raleigh Grande Prix  :  Old Motebecanes :  Steel Treks, etc.  There are a LOT of these bikes out there.  I would actually recommend advertising your need and price to your local network of friends, and someone may have just what you need sitting in their basement / attic.  If you will be riding in an urban / reasonably flat area, don't rule out a single speed that has one chain ring in the front, one gear in the back,  and no derailleurs. I recently built one up for a customer from [SE Racing](http://www.sebikes.com/Singlespeed.aspx) that was a good example -- new for well less that $300, but there's a a bunch of companies out there doing the same thing. BUT, a [fixed gear](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Fixed_gear) is quite different from a single speed because you can't COAST without your feet moving like hell to keep up with the pedals. Don't be fooled into buying a fixed gear if you're not prepared.  Good luck . Bikes rock.  Note: I work as a bike mechanic. About 20 yrs experience. No company affiliations. 
exactly, clean it really good before you hire her and after that, it's her job to keep it up for you.
It's fun to have fun, but you have to know how.  - Dr. Seuss
Haha you really are an imbecile.  I love it.  Not even hard facts can deter you.  Keep watching Fox News instead of thinking for yourself, dipshit.
while i support the fact that a company payed for a stereotype ... this man is no way a modern day Rosa Parks. So Please STFU
Your arguments are becoming circular.  For instance,  &gt;The Republican party platform calls for no exception even to save the life of the mother, even when the fetus can't be saved. That makes it pretty clear what the agenda is.  This would hardly have gotten in the platform--and remained there for 14 years and counting--if it weren't a mainstream opinion.  First off, it it were a **mainstream** opinion, abortion would be illegal.  Secondly, the Republicans have proven they're only interested in having the plank for show, so it doesn't matter what it says.  Thirdly, just like the Democrats appealed to the far-left fringe of the party to win the Presidency in 2008, the Republicans use things like this to appeal to the far-right fringe.  But, as Obama has shown recently (where's the public option for health care?) and the Republicans have shown in the past, what's said to win an election means nothing after the election is over. &gt;You don't consider trying to pass a Constitutional amendment that would *require* the deaths of innocent women for no reason other than the right wing's emotional gratification to have anything to do with "dismantling freedoms."?  If that's what I thought was actually going to happen, then I would agree.  But there's no way that a) such an amendment is going to be brought up for ratification at this point and b) such an amendment would have a chance of passage *unless* there was an exception for the health of the mother.  &gt;Yet you still refer to these people as "Pro-life" and make excuses for them.  As I've said, I don't like the term "anti-choice", and if you go back and read the thread, I don't think I've made excuses for them.  I may have explained what I see as their position, but I've made pretty clear that I don't agree with a lot of it, so I think this accusation is baseless.  &gt;At what point? Are you talking about viability?  Nope, I'm talking about the moment of conception.  However, for what it's worth, the Bible mentions there's no life until the mother can feel the baby move, so you could make a case that the Bible would allow for pre-emptive abortions (not that I would, but still...).  &gt;Exactly! The politicians don't want it, because they don't want blood on their hands. But it would be political suicide for them to take it out of the platform, because it's what the right wing voter wants.  See the above point about exclusions.  I don't think I've proven your point about the "huge popular demand", because I don't think it exists, and you haven't proven that it does, except by saying that because of the way the Republican platform reads it proves that there's a big demand that women be allowed to die.  &gt;And you can always find a dishonest apologist who claims that a woman's life is never in danger, even when she dies.  Maybe, but no matter what the apologists say, the abortion will have been done.  As I've said before, to some fanatics there should be no exceptions and therefore, no thought is necessary, but to most of us there is some thought involved.  I wouldn't think that you could have a law restricting abortion *without* an exception for the life of the mother, but then, I'm not a fanatic.  &gt;The right to exist is a pretty basic freedom.  Yep - that's why I'm against abortion, at least when it's used as retroactive birth control.  Most abortions are not necessary to save the mother's life or health, and those are the ones I'm against.  Don't get me wrong - I'm not saying that women shouldn't have control of their bodies, but they have control when deciding to have sex, and especially when deciding to have unprotected sex.  After that, if they get pregnant they should not be aborting what is another human being.   
&gt; (like those requiring you to move to the right to yield to faster traffic...  But if you're going the speed limit in the left lane, their is no faster traffic.  Unless they are speeding, in which case, they are as in the wrong as people going slower then the minimum speed, or breaking other laws.  As for the white car, the cars behind could have recovered.  Unfortunately, another car kept their speed up, and essentially got so close to the car in front they had to slow rather quickly.  Instead, if they had moderated their speed instead of speeding, they would have been fine.  Both breakers, slow drivers, and speeders all share the blame.
Everyday.
I feel that way about Sprint PCS, but without a explanation, or link to a site with a explanation, then it is a just a statement of your opinion..
Well, you're entitled to your opinions. And I to mine. They've been around a long time. And like so many "conspiracies" has been  debunked to the satisfaction of most people. As to "proven to be scarily accurate"...so have the prophecies of Nostradamus if you accept the "connections". Personally most "proofs" are "reaching for facts and connections" and nothing more.
That makes me want to see them on the [telephone](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=t4jCXLfsUpI&amp;feature=related)
I highly doubt all of those statistics are valid and unbiased. Before posting those kinds of statistics you have to look at the survey methods; it's really easy to accidentally bias results if not conducted properly. A lot of the "source" links on list don't even have a citation. It's just randomly inserted into a paragraph with no explanation of where it came from.
There was a short like 10 minute special with the 5th and 10th Doctors. But I agree, seeing a full speical with the 4 Doctors would be pretty cool.
vegetables!!! A lot of them! Steamed not fried.
Thank you. I dislike age-ism in all its forms. 
I can feel it crawling on my back.
&gt;All the other stats appear to come from one source, the Left Business Observer. That's what I noticed too.  I'm not sure how reliable they are. &gt;There is prison labor. Prisoners volunteer for it because they have families to feed or want to buy stuff like everyone else. This is what I always thought too.
Too good to be true, it was all a pr trick for the coming single.  Almost as good as this http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=V5Dv28kp4P0
The question to your answer is no.  Still, if you consider fitness as in the broadest sense, the primary effect *is* the side effect -- there's nothing 'healthy' about depending on caffeine or aspirin to get you through your day.
I CAN CRACK MY DICK
Unfortunately, that seems to be for mosque/mausk.
Focusing on controlling little shit like this helps people feel like they are doing something to extend their life. Meanwhile, the largest cause of death is heart disease, which could be easily avoided by lifestyle changes.
She's 9
My dad thinks all drugs, even heavy ones like heroin, should be legal and available with a prescription and a safe zone. His argument is that if someone is diagnosed with a particular addiction they could be supplied the drug in minimum quantities by a doctor. The dosages would systematically be lowered to ween them off it. It would also help to lower crime to do with drugs.  Admittedly, it's an extreme idea and would never actually happen because drug legalization is so taboo. I don't know if it would even work or just be abused. 
Haha I know, I only think I've watched a couple of episodes with sound, have seen the whole series twice with music though. 
The current industry suffers from what is called the [captured regulator](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Regulatory_capture) effect.  Regulations exist that now benefit large companies.  Those regulations were originally meant to protect individuals but had unintended consequences that ended up protecting large companies instead.  Net Neutrality legislation will be more of the same.  The solution is to repeal the existing regulations and replace them with nothing.  E.g. VOIP is able to compete with segments of old telecom *because* VOIP was and still is almost completely unregulated, relative to old telecom.
Predicting lottery numbers. 
Rockstar Table Tennis.
&gt;Turned out some **people** robbed him  See how that doesn't change the meaning of your story at all?
Honestly thought this was a troll for about three minutes.
Sample size.
my morning = ruined
That's fine, but just know that the American College of Sports Medicine, American Dietary Association, and Dietitians of Canada all agree based on a meta analysis of multiple scientific studies that the above protein recommendations hold.  You can read it yourself here: http://www.adajournal.org/article/S0002-8223%2800%2900428-4/abstract
Indeed. I found myself bobbing my head to that one.
exercise and eating right is generally the right recepie for weight loss but it takes a long time - like 1-2 pounds per week.  So if you wanna do it the healthy way its also going to be the 'slowly but surely' way. I had a sleep disorder as an undergraduate that cost me a year and a half of school and made me gain 45 pounds because it torpedoed my metabolism.  I lost it over about 6 or 9 months and am now back to my size 2/4 self.  the first thing you need to do is find an online site that will calculate the number of calories you need per day based on your Basic Metabolic Rate.  Its easy to find a site like this.  They will tell you how many calories you need per day if you want to loose weight.  Also once you reach your goal weight, you can then use the site to calculate how much calories you need to mantain your current weight. Once you figure the above out, eat and exercise accordingly.  I use workout videos to work out with.  I find that I am not one of those ppl who like working out so I need variety.  You can get a variety of pretty intense workout videos now.  I don't like the gym because I need instruction and direction, and plus I feel like I waste time getting in the car and then driving there and back etc. Also buy cookbooks made for low fat or low calorie recepies.  Diabetic or heart healthy cookbooks are also very good. You should absolutely eat a good breakfast!  Whats PB crunch?  It sounds sugary.  I eat a smoothie with a bananna, blueberries, skim milk, lowfat plain yogurt, and vanilla extract.  Also I have  some high fiber cereal and a glass of OJ.  I get that uber high fiber stuff that has like 1/2 the daily dose of fiber per 1/2 cup and tastes like cardboard.  Trust me it is worth it because (assuming you drink atleast 6 cups of fluid per day) it will keep your system moving and decrease the bloat!!  If you can't stand the taste do what I do and add 1/2 a cup or a whole cup if you are extra hungary, of healthyish but better tasting cereal to the mix and then top with a sliced bananna or some strawberries or blueberries or something. take a look at the Canadian Food Guide for an idea of what types of food u should be consuming and in what percentages. I think your diet needs some fruits an veggies.  Even eating some V-8 juice would be a good start. If you need something hot in the morning (seeing as you like coffee) have hot water with a lemon in it.  Save the fancy starbucks coffee drinks for a treat.  
So if a man took your money and spent it, and the justice system put him in jail...how exactly are you getting your money back? Your question is "What's the purpose of a prison system?" and the answer to that has changed over the years.  IT used to be a place to separate the violent and thieving from the peaceful and proper.  Now it is a tool of the system to weed out anyone not obeying their arcane laws.  Violent offenders go to jail side by side with people selling a substance to people who want it.  Armed robbers go to jail side by side with women consenting to sex for money with a consenting man.  The system is broken, and jail is where the unfortunate go.
you're looking for [ps3 media server](http://code.google.com/p/ps3mediaserver/)  it sets up a media server on your pc which you use to stream to your ps3. if you use windows, it should be cinch to set up. it comes with mplayer which will handle all your transcoding needs.
I prefer the subtlety of [NSFW\_Full\_Stop](http://www.reddit.com/user/NSFW_Full_Stop).
the guide?
Aka Zen Buddhism with more fun. (Yes I know that there are differences. But on the surface, this is true.)
Yeah I agree. NSFW that crap up or IT'S BANSTICK FOR YOU.
Good for TF2 hats, maybe...
Aaaand, the wild part?   Be brave, and go for it.
Exactly, Sodium Nitrate is "Peru saltpeter" or "Chile saltpeter." Just regular old "saltpeter" refers to Potassium Nitrate. Right from the link you posted.
The destructive capacities of particular drugs is (currently) recognized by law. [Controlled Drugs and Substances Act](http://laws.justice.gc.ca/en/C-38.8/). Drugs falling under schedules 1-8 are treated differently. Note that [bill S-10](http://www2.parl.gc.ca/Sites/LOP/LEGISINFO/index.asp?Language=E&amp;Session=23&amp;query=7007&amp;List=toc) would change this drastically and has a very good chance of passing.
I don't think sniffing them will help them achieve sobriety.  
Holy sweet fuck, what the hell is with generational warfare on Reddit? Are we getting an influx of older people? Every single one of these "We're old but don't suck, you suck too" posts are getting majorly upvoted so whats with the fucking confrontational tone? Ok grandpa, your generation isn't that bad. Can we fucking calm down now?  I'm seriously curious if there was a recent demographic shift on reddit. It ultimately doesn't matter how old you are, or what generation (x,y,z) the psych press decides to foist on you.   Also, just because you are a baby boomer doesn't mean you invented the PC or the internet. Chances are you didn't invent a god-damn thing. Stop taking credit for what individuals who happen to have been born at around the same time as you did.
It's been so long since I've played them, I hardly remember how it worked.  I do remember that it crashed a lot.
I'm just gunna through this out there. What about Roswell. If, and it is a HUGE if, extraterrestrials really did crash. True photographic evidence could have far reach implications in science and religion.
A few Romanian bands I like:  [Negură Bunget](http://youtu.be/zyKITevP2W4) - Atmospheric Black Metal  [Coma](http://youtu.be/INs53aytFx8) - Alternative Metal  [Brazda lui Novac](http://youtu.be/U6l91WohBIM) - Electronic  [Thy Veils](http://youtu.be/qxElrZmEBXM) - Electronic  [CTC](http://youtu.be/GxiZ99Iwkzs) - Hip Hop
&gt;Responsible / intelligent disclosure can work.  Assuming the responsible organization knows they have every professional security consultant in the world staring at their system.
Approved!
Chill out, man, because it isn't really that important.
I have lived in the countries of Commonwealth my good sir, by the US Standards, everyone on the planet is a filthy, filthy, dirty pig.
I clicked the comments specifically to post this.
pedagogy
Just because you put that lame disclaimer doesn't make it acceptable to use it. Filthy hateful word.  You wouldn't have chosen that word to describe white dudes doing the same thing, so don't use it, you racist fuck.
Go tell that "black people vs. niggers" theory to some old black lady from Georgia who's been called a nigger all her life by a bunch of racists. See how she reacts.  Then maybe reconsider why you think your theory gives you a pass to easily use a word that still offends so many people.
I'm not sure I want the added complexity of systems switching between hot- and cold-blooded.  There are enough disorders as it is without someone going cold-blooded during winter and freezing.
Bill and Ted's Radical Return ?
What I mean is, in an ideal world, the effects of the practice should be given, not blindly followed.  I think from a beginners perspective, a lot of the times the conclusions of the practice are not framed in the correct way to make sense.  For example: Chakra's are a real occurrence, at some stages you can feel a sort of energy flowing through different locations of your body.  However, how it's framed in many traditions implies that those things are there for some other reason, happen because you're energy is blocked up, or that they mean a certain thing.  But what's not imparted is that conclusion is reached by way of introspection using a specific technique, it's generally not something found if you don't practice that technique, nor are many of the explanatory theories very good at explaining the phenomenon or what happens.  The reasons behind the phenomenon is usually wildly out of touch, whereas the actual occurrence of the phenomenon is still valid. However, the practice itself will most likely change what you think about things.  
Yes people have successfully used them, and yes, it is morally wrong.
Not only do I have few if any relationships but all the other equivalent factors besides obesity.
I've been searching for a way to say that.  Thanks.
I totally do it! Getting on my bike/getting off my bike even.
WSJ investigates the state of the art of online tracking, as it relates to individual privacy.
hahahhahah this is way to funny!
i'd suggest a yamaha or ibanez. it's a great starter bass. i really like yamahas for starter gear.   here's a really nice one with active pickups. you have to decide whether you want active or regular pickups. i find active pickups to be more versatile and better for jazz, pop etc., but if you're playing rock you might want passive... active pickups can be annoying when teamed with stomp boxes and loud distorted bass... happy hunting.  http://cgi.ebay.com/Yamaha-BB1500A-Active-Jazz-Bass-/220643450235?cmd=ViewItem&amp;pt=Guitar&amp;hash=item335f5fdd7b  here's a good passive choice: http://cgi.ebay.com/Yamaha-BB414-4-String-Electric-Bass-Guitar-Black-/390217943056?cmd=ViewItem&amp;pt=Guitar&amp;hash=item5adacd4810
I don't mind sitting in the dining area. What color shirt are you wearing?
The fact that you made up some ranking system for black people doesn't mean it's ok to use a term that makes people feel bad. 
Just look for me in a P90X commercial, I'll be the one slathering hot sauce and a 5 layer burrito on my massive pecks while doing one handed push-ups.
Laugh track.  God, why?!
Are there any lawyers here who can answer this question?  Can a man who raises another man's child sue him for past child expenses?
I'd rather not say, but it wasn't T14, if that's what you're asking.
you're 20! who knows what kinda crazy shenanigans you're going to get yourself into... why don't you try a threesome with another guy?!   I thought I was gay once, turned out to be the gas.   but I don't think getting off to gay porn means your gay... maybe! You never know until you try, i guess. 
Ahh yes, women of the redhaired persuasion. How you tantalize me so.
As an ex-Californian, this.  What I paid for a 2 cottage house built in the 1800s (exposed electrical and only about 3 grounded outlets in the entire place) - $80 gets me a 3br 1.5ba house in TN. :|  Electricity is expensive as fuck too.  I liked the California, but it was a constant struggle to live in a tiny out of date poorly cooled poorly heated place.  That and I was being gouged in terms of wages left and right, I'm making 25% more on my probation period in TN than I did at other companies in CA. 
Indubidably indeedio so
Yes. Differential GPS is when you have a receiver that not only uses GPS satellite signals to determine its location, but its position relative to a ground station. For more info on how this works, [wikipedia](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Differential_GPS).  In the field, we have achieved near-instantaneous millimeter accuracy. It's pretty awesome.
&gt; Why would I want these fucking little pieces of paper everywhere?  You might want to return something, and your bank won't break down what you buy.
I mentioned religion because your name is Aetheistan.   &gt;I just think that the story has been somewhat embellished.   Believe what you want.  &gt; it's not that important to me, so downvote away, if you so wish.  I didn't downvote. In fact, you have two upvotes - one was you, one was me. I was apologizing for the fact that you'd get downvoted to oblivion simply for doubting.
It's actually a lot easier to hand out secret information now, thanks to the internet. 
I think you're chasing your own tail on that one, Reddit is held together by its quality puns.
I disagree, while I wish they'd shown the scene of him being dragged into the Pandorica because I think that adds so much more impact, it is a wonderful scene that is one of the peaks of Matt's acting.  Yes, I've agreed previously with them reusing every alien costume they had in the wardrobe, but I don't think it takes away from the drama of that scene. Eleven is *scared*, and Matt really shows it. It's one of the ones that will remain with me the most out of this series (and the "Nobody HUMAN has anything to say to me today!"), so I do think it deserves to be number one.  (And not quite, the Judoon were there, they're not villains. Yet. Heh.)
Yes, Only if he will wear colorful suspenders...
Bitches ain't shit.
Mine as well. 
&gt;It wasn't about drunk, it was about closing the bar. Did you miss that part?  Are you high or something? Because that made no sense whatsoever. &gt; And no, I didn't complain about anything. I noted that he was attacking, in response to his complaint, and he confirmed I was right. It's actually impressive how you can interpret it this way. I am almost in awe of your self-rightiousness.   
I'd advise against shrimp (and probably steaks) if you're on an especially tight budget.
Order them well done and animal style and reevaluate.
See, I was gonna reply but there's a Super Fill Up just to the right of this that just needs a little playing...
Yes, but this is the POINT of the Senate.  The Senate is supposed to prevent us from the tyranny of the majority.
The [prison camp Russian Roulette scene in Deer Hunter](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=BPi2AetitZc) . Whenever I watch the movie in it's entirety and get caught up in the story my heart pounds, I get sweaty and I'm on the edge of my seat during the this scene. It's intensity is amazing. Walken &amp; DeNiro are at their best in this movie.
Being a vagabond might be good idea for you, but your daughter is gonna suffer.
The Wire (Baltimore drug scene, seen through the eyes of drug dealers, and law enforcement 9.7/10) IMDB  Damages (Bright and sharp law school graduate Ellen Parsons becomes the protégée of the successful and hard-hitting high stakes litigator Patricia Hewes. But nothing is what it seems 8.7/10) IMDB
Nah, she has a thing for Bowser.
His name is: [Jaquay Roane, David Macon Jr., or Justin Pooler](http://www.dailylocal.com/articles/2009/04/15/news/doc49e5bb7eac652015495534.txt)
Costa Rica, Panama
@inabook  "I want to help, but if I'm supposed to be the enemy, what can I do?"  *offers olive branch* =)
&gt;  I have sometimes suspected that an international, feminist, antimale conspiracy is behind perpetrating an impossible and inhuman ideal of how men should behave   From what I have seen, it is most likely to be males inflicting this impossible ideal on *each other*.  Whenever a man shows any non-macho trait - such as an unwillingness to be always ready and willing for sex or allowing the wishes of his wife to influence his decisions - it is *other guys* who crucify him for it.  I think it is important for the men's rights movement to concentrate on how you treat each other - not just on how you are treated by "feminists".
Deal with it [](/troll)
Don't get married.
ENLIGHTENMENT! FUCK YEAH!
it's so beeaauuutiful 
Like the way your cockhead peeks out like that!
You hand $100 to an anonymous stranger on the street. You don't even know the dude's name. The stranger takes your money and uses most of it to buy things you don't approve of and wouldn't buy yourself, like booze, drugs, guns, and ammo for the guns. You are the dude's main source of income so he knows he has to use a tiny bit (the smallest amount he can get away with, no more, no less) of your money to provide you with *protection*. He also appeases you a little bit with perks like schools, and libraries, but mainly he just keeps buying more and more booze and guns and ammo with your money.   This continues pretty much until you die, no matter how much you protest or complain.   Next question?
Where is that "Who was phone" person that usually comes in with the ಠ_ಠ?
Walking into any sort of restaurant, pub or café, you can expect them to have at least one token Swede working there. Unless it's one of the immigrant places, then it's a family business.
&gt; You're probably right about the Spec, but you're wrong about the Trek, although this was 2 years ago when my friend bought his. Maybe Quebec is just different that way, or was in the past. You can also get Bontrager's and Gary Fisher's at retail outlets, and as far as I know, Fisher and Bontrager are both owned by Trek these days, so it's not a huge leap to picture Trek bikes outside of licensed bike shops.  It must be a Canadian thing then, Ive never seen that in the states.  I stand corrected.  Kona is definitely a good brand.  
Okay, thanks for the answers.
I've recently begun to kick ass at Soldier. I started playing as him for the first time during the WAR update, when he was one of my lowest played classes, he recently overtook both my Medic and Pyro times which were considerably higher than the rest.  Last week was possibly my finest moment with him.   Ctf_well, at the other team's capture point. Our intelligence was gone, taken by a scout heading toward me. I caught him in the intel room after getting rid of the enemy engie's sentry.   My first two rockets missed, he had cover while running up the stairs and I figured he'd get the cap, but fired a last-dash rocket at the point itself. It hit.   I then had to defend the intelligence mere inches away from  the cap point from the pyro and two soldiers that raced in to salvage the point.   After 60 seconds I heard the beautiful tobacco-ravaged voice of the announcer "Our intelligence has returned to our base" before I victory rocket-jumped out of dodge. Unfortunately my health was lower than I realised and I gibbed myself at the scene of my finest moment.
thank you.  almost clicked on it at work
In either case, she's just a pathetic concern troll, and is dragging down the debate with her arguments.
ahem  KEEELLLL loves orange soda!
So I guess you wouldn't have liked it very much when Jesus prayed:  "Give **us** this day **our** daily bread, and forgive **us our** sins just as **we** forgive the sins of others". 
That was pretty damn genius... oh wait... FFFUUUUU
I totally agree that competition would be the ideal situation. However we live in Canada. We have two major political parties and they both do things wrong. The conservatives seem to enjoy the current procurement process we are using, and the liberals tend to stiff the military whenever possible. I do not agree with either but having multiple family members currently in the CF I will tend to slant towards the political party who gives our people the best equipment.
An affinity for pubs, firearms, and anti zombie leanings? We could totally hang out!
Rowing team? Where did you go to high school, Yale?
True. The guy that invented Maglite died a billionaire. Before Maglite, all flashlights were pieces of shit. I remember banging on them CONSTANTLY to make the connections work. Try fixing your furnace that way! Maybe I should build a better umbrella...
wtf.  look at his signature.  also, his grammar is surprisingly decent.
I guess that washing machine /dons sunglasses was bricked.
a) You were saying you couldn't use it (because it wasn't a Slackware package). I was explaining that, even though you had no use (noun) for it, you could still use (verb) it anyway.  b) I'm not. Was just trying to help out.
Not too bad. I can't chew though.
He has shit to think about or shit to do. Leave him alone and ignore him for a while, he'll eventually talk to you. 
I can't what I'm saying, right?
Yea, that flux button almost made me check if I had any tabs left...in my, uh, browser.
This is the most fucked up movie on this list/that has ever been made, it seriously is. The only reason it isn't higher up is because not enough people have seen it. Watching the whole thing is like an exercise in discomfort, and you are unlikely to be bothered by movie violence again. 
Ah, the cycle of life.
ReGenesis. Charlie Jade.
Does him being overweight make it worse?
I did know that! I bought one a few years back at Zellers. Get comments all the time.
Bah, can't get it to work. As soon as I get near a fight, Windows chokes and dies horribly.  I've got software rendering on and I'm running it in a window, so shrug, dunno wtf's wrong.
Until 2 days ago about that lady complaining that someone stalked her at a restaurant, I didn't know what foursquare was either.   Meh guess its blowing up but I would never give my coord's to someone on a website where I am at that very second. It wastes battery!
Have any of your students been in an accident with you? If so what was the worst?
Watchmen
Haha, I have 147,000 miles on it. Trust me, I was about 30 minutes away from getting rid of it and getting an '07 GTI today -- I had someone willing to buy the car, and I had found the GTI I wanted. While I have the $$$$ and budget for a newer car, I've decided to ride this one out until it dies.  And, yes I know, a GTI isn't a step up in general reliability, but going from 147,000 miles to 30,000 miles is.
Who gives a shit? I find it funny now, isn't that good enough? Here's a protip for you: in 1000 years, no one will remember Reddit existed, let alone anything that was ever said on it.
It's not that sad as it is touching.
Christian Vampires!
I was at a party and it was pretty late so my friend and I decided to go home. As I was leaving, a guy who lived in the house came up to me and accused me of bringing my own private stock of their beers home with me. I'm standing there in a tiny little dress with a too small handbag hanging off my wrist. There's no place where I could possibly hide said beers, unless he thinks I'm hiding them in my cooter.   I'm very non-confrontational so I say "No, don't worry, I don't have anything," and I turn to go out the door. Easier said than done. This massive guy doesn't believe me, so he grabs me by the arm and spins me around so I'm facing him (I had to look up about a foot or so, I'm talking about a BIG guy). He asks me if I have any beers and I look down at myself again asserting that there is no where in my tiny dress and handbag to put them, and say "No, let me leave." This asshole shoves me full force into the corner of the doorframe and I hit my head. I'm not very big, I weigh about 115 and this guy had to be over 200 pounds. At that point his friends come over and start freaking out at him. I'm standing there stunned as this guy is looming over me like he wants to kick my ass. The only thing I can think to do is to knock his beer out of his hand... not much with self defense, I guess. Frighteningly enough, the beer lands on his cell phone. At that point, I see a terrifying rage come over his face. I run away because I'm seriously fearing for my life at this point.  Relieved that its over, my friend and I start walking back to my apartment. As we're walking I can hear swift foot steps, I look to my left and I see the guy running full sprint through someone's yard at me. Obviously I'm scared because it appears as if he's coming for me... or has some other reason to be running really fast, I don't really know. Luckily, it was dark out and the people whose yard it was had lined their the front yard with wooden poles connected by chains about a foot high. As the guy is full on sprinting he trips over the chain and high velocity face plants into the sidewalk right at my feet. I had a good chuckle and continued walking home.
MY NAME IS BOLO SANTOSI
Don't take life too seriously — it's for having fun.
As an outsider, I guess a "denier" I'm going to be honest.  We're not terrified.  We honestly just think you guys are creationist level stupid.  Independent of arguments etc. that I'm not going to get into, we really just think you're crazy and feel bad for you.
This would be more like if Nolan were tasked to reboot Batman after Following. Memento and Insomnia are much bigger titles than Peter Jackson's early work.
My pets also had abstract names.  Had a dog named moo, a rat named fish, etc.  My brother though.....when he was really young, he was allowed to name one of my rats, he eventually settled on naming it Henry.
They appear to be getting popular, so they sell them at regular supermarkets around here. You can also get them online, e.g. this [shop](http://www.waschnuss.com/) (in German) sells them for 14 Euros a kilo - which can last well over a year depending on how often you wash. Here's an US-based [shop](http://stores.buysoapnuts.com) which sells them at 22$/500g I prefer the crushed nut rinds over the powdered variant because the powder leaves ugly brown remains in the detergent chamber.
This. Is. My. New. Ringtone.
Get a pork shoulder and make pulled pork! It costs like $1.29/lb for the meat, and the process of cooking the pulled pork couldn't really be easier.
I operate one ;) 
Here goes nothing....  http://imgur.com/bqero
And watch the Johnny Vegas episodes last. That stupid fat fuck just tries to take over and is very far from funny. 
I came to post Cuckoo's Nest as well. I can't believe so many people liked the movie I thought it was pretty horrible compared to the book.  Ken Kesey hated the movie as well. 
You forgot to include the video. (Actually, you probably did include it, but, upon changing to the tab that allows self-text, it disallows a link.)  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=518XP8prwZo  Probably that one.  But, as far as facts go, a single person does not Ukraine's talent make. If you feel like posting it to share with people, the best place would be [/r/videos](/r/videos), although I'm not sure the most recent time that has been posted...  But, anyway, even if the link were included here, it wouldn't be right for TIL, as cool a video as it may be. Just wanted to let you know. Thanks, though. :)
He'll get you with his feelers.
Thanks!
My friend doesn't look like a stoner at all, they were just stopping and searching every car that passed by. It was the policia local that got him. Hiding it isn't even that useful, the Guardia quite often have sniffer dogs with them when they do random stop/checks in my area.
Watch the puncture wound. If it begins to swell, feel warm/hot to the touch or if colour (would be red/purple) begins to streak out from the puncture area, you have an infection and need to get her to the doctor for antibiotics. Bring the picture with you.  I got a tick bite this spring, thought it was a mosquito bite until it got infected and swollen. The infection spread to my lymph nodes and I was on antibiotics for about 2 months. Not fun. Keep an eye on it. 
Pleasure him with the sharp-end of a shovel.
i'm not sure you're understanding how it applies on a larger scale then.
.
no
On the way to high school one morning year, I saw a car that had been speeding, swerved to miss something in the road and lost control. It slammed head-first into a tree at full speed, and got thrown back across the street in a flat spin, hit in a ditch (in someone's yard), and rolled a few times.   The driver was in my senior class (didn't know 'em), and was in the hospital for months. The passenger didn't make it, which I could clearly tell when I drove by.  I drove by about 3 minutes after the event, the entire yard was already full of cars, friends/family who saw the car.   I told a friend of mine what I saw (didn't recognize the car) when I got to school, it turns out he was good friends with the one who didn't make it. 
I'm male and went through a phase of wanting kids. First wife didn't want them, second one only told me that she did after we were married. I would have been OK without them but I've got three and I'm really happy with them, and with domesticity.   Ain't nothing wrong with wanting a family.
Why are Unknown Artist's albums all called Untitled? For a creative and prolific producer that's showing a severe lack of imagination.
Only MAC supporters can get upset by the posting of the actual cost of an Apple product.
Do they sell anything to safely color the water in pools? Or would a shitload of food coloring do the job? This is only going to be a one time thing for a pool party.  Re plastering the pool is obviously not a cost efficient option.
( i )
English/Realtor
They absolutely are from more than one night.   Wiki: Most of the songs were recorded at The Roxy Theatre in Hollywood, California  on December 8, 9 and 10, 1973. The material taken from the Roxy concerts was later amended with some overdubs in the studio, while the "Elsewhere" tracks ("Son of Orange County" &amp; "More Trouble Every Day") were recorded on May 8, 1974 at the Edinboro State College, Edinboro, Pennsylvania (and parts of "Son of Orange County" on May 11, 1974 at the Auditorium Theatre in Chicago, Illinois (late show)) and do not contain overdubbed material.
Is that a picture of a dead rat covered in lettuce and agent orange?
We would need at least a formal denial to even consider his innocence. 
Even if there is a difference according to you, you should never call someone a nigger...
So, mostly burning.
If you make $1M or more a year, likely the majority of that is not your salary.  People who are rich make most of their money on investments.  Investments, if planned wisely, are in lower tax bracket, because the government wants to encourage investments.  In other words, the CEO who makes a salary of $1M a year also has investments, stocks, etc, that make him an additional $5M a year.  He pays big on the $1M, but probably pays less on the $5M.
lol his name was paul robertson
Canarsie!
Doesn't look neaaarly as bad as the ghetto Sharpie eyebrows I see on a lot of hoodrats and skanks!
I noticed you just did, and I personally tend to point out examples of vegans drawing these parallels, and not vegetarians, and I think this is salient. Vegetarians are all over the world, including third-world nations and former colonies, and are usually (number-wise) a result of religion and/or culture. On the other hand, vegan is a lifestyle *choice* that for the most part, tends to be taken by Western white non-improverished in certain geographic markets that can sustain the lifestyle. It's no wonder white and class privilege have a tendency to show up in the arguments.  &gt;And women are raped, ergo dairy cows are raped.  Yeah, there's [this article from 2005](http://www.satyamag.com/jan05/matthews.html) making the rounds in some feminist spaces that equates human reproduction with animal reproduction, written by a woman. The term "rape rack" is taken as an affront to cows, where the real argument isn't that animals are being "raped", it's that humans are being devalued to the level of animals who are incapable of giving consent. *Sigh...*  I don't follow Dan Savage that much, but I'm amazed he would say that in 2009 after [Nate Silver thoroughly debunked that myth in 2008](http://www.fivethirtyeight.com/2008/11/prop-8-myths.html). I understand the rage, but it's completely misdirected, and the oppression olympics isn't helpful at all.
So long to another famous NYC skatespot. 
You were a dog in both...  Did you go all-in preflop?  If so, is AQ ahead of their stack off range?  Did you go allin postflop?  If so, were you ahead of their stack off range?  If you were ahead of their stack off range, then you made money over the long run, and shouldn't fret.  If you weren't ahead of their stack-off range, then you made a mistake, and that can hardly be blamed on the hand you had.
You'll be really cold if you shut the door and the windows.  Fan Death is real and you'll be cold as a corpse.
Your comment has me even more excited than I already am. Any redditors wanna meet up? I'm going to have a big reddit alien on my tent to attract any brethren
&gt;He is so dreamy.  Pun intended? (I just saw Inception last night and have no idea what went on for about half of the movie because I was too busy ogling his character)
Not only that, it's owned by fox news's rupert murdoch.  
no good deed goes unpunished.
Yup. I call it 'doing the macarena', as I'm checking 5-7 pockets.
&gt; Wastes a few seconds of my time and diminishes interest in the actual video  At the risk of sounding like a douche, you must be referring to the titillating, action-filled plot of the full 3 minute video?  BTW, I fully agree with you on the titles thing.
No they don't, but that is a great example of the type of hamfisted arguments I'm talking about. 
If you're leaving somewhere, and you look at something and say "ah, i won't need that", then bring it. Because you'll always regret it.
Which bar do you like best? What kind of adjustment period are you talking about? Can you detail it for me?   Thanks!
Another reason to click that 'hide' button.. Goodbye.
no that's your logic which failed...
I've only been to In-N-Out once, but I must opine that Hardee's burgers are superior.
My mom is a loan officer/realtor, and the one thing she always tells me is to avoid taking student loans as much as possible. She has had countless clients that had a hard time getting a loan, or could only get a smaller load, due to the amount of student debt they had. And most of these people didn't even go to graduate school, which adds even *more* debt.  That being said, you can't really help it. Work as much as you can, apply for *any* scholarship you're eligible for (it's a lot of work, but worth it).
&gt; _But if you're going the speed limit in the left lane, their is no faster traffic. Unless they are speeding, in which case, they are as in the wrong as people going slower then the minimum speed, or breaking other laws._  Doesn't matter. The law (in California at least) is that you have to yield no matter what speed you're driving.
Animal cruelty is a sign of a serial killer, so whoever did that could be capable of even worse unfortunately. =[
Any other atheists here ever suspect /r/atheism is actually a front for some religious group, designed to make atheists look dumb by offering the most ridiculous arguments in the name of atheism?
At least you realized it before you bought it.  (stares at pull up bar he just bought 2 days ago).
Jesus encouraged Adolf Hitler to carry out his great ideas. Or at least god said it's good. Of course you have to be a finely attuned christian before you can actually 'converse' with god.
What exactly is captain hook supposed to be leering at?
Isn't that the definition of most of our lives?
Women  having labour pains. 
Yes, there can be a theoretical reduction in count, but I believe the general health/fitness compared to a sedentary lifestyle will make you more man overall.  There's plenty of old cyclists with swarms of grandkids.
Thanks Dad. 
In what way?
carbs aren't bad - just the starchy ones.  Like don't abandon pasta, just switch to whole weat pasta.
Not aging.
I had a 5 day/1300mi ride planned a few years ago for early Oct - usually still dry here in Northern CA.  Alas, as it grew closer, the forecast showed rain showers.   Me and two buddies went for it anyway.    It rained off and on for ~3 of the 5 days... I consider it the most miserable ...and...*awesome* ride I've ever been on.  [Here](http://photos.linquist.net/2008/2008-10-06-NorCal-Extreme/292031904813d62936b9o/420589256_CeZQS-L.jpg) is a pic I took in Lassen Volcanic National Park on that ride.  Brrr.
Green man!!
Seeing the OP's name makes this 100 times better. 
Iraq'n you've had the best pun so far.
From what Ive read on the matter yes.  The whole paperless gambit is just a scapegoat for banks.  Whether it is true or not, it seems to just be safer to get the printed statement, keep for a few years then make sure you recycle it. 
they were basically ron paulites in the beginning. They started back in 2006. I still mostly disagreed with them back then but it disturbs me how effectively the GOP basically took them over. It makes me wonder if successful third parties could ever be formed. Without one of the major parties just taking them over.
chickenheads are important too 
Don´t trust anyone
Ahh, I had a similar childhood 35-guinea pigs stint. Though not simultaneously. I think I had 9 at one time at most.  I still hear the squeaking in my sleep...
Reddit found the keymaster and the gatekeeper?  We gotta get these two together.
Counter terrorist. Dying at the hands of terrorists every few minutes for the rest of time can get boring y'know.
A big fucking asteroid impact. 
Love the stuff - I quilt and make shirts with it.
when i was in high school, my friend's ipod was stolen.  music was replaced and some dinosaur porn was placed on it.
http://code.google.com/p/chromium/issues/detail?id=43221  That was fixed a while ago.
I doubt it.  If this comes with sshd enabled and running with PasswordAuthentication enabled, and a weak password, it seems likely it'll get compromised some point soon after getting connected to the internet.  (Have you ever seen the auth.log for a linux box with sshd running that's not behind a firewall, NAT-without-port-forwarding, etc.?  Brute-force connection attempt city...)  Windows may have its security problems, but these days (i.e. since XP SP2 when the firewall started to be enabled by default), getting compromised just from being connected to the internet -- i.e. while just sitting there -- isn't much of a problem any more (due to the firewall), thankfully.
You've obviously never met grad students going for interviews.
Martyrs or August Underground?
Skin temp is around 86 degrees F - that's why.
Yea, like everything else trying to accomplish anything, our bodies try their darnest to emulate Carnot engines.
Is it true?
This video does a good job of describing why that version of the broken windows theory is a fallacy (there's another, unrelated, "broken windows" concept dealing with crime and law and order that is not a fallacy), but then through sleight of hand and a giant leap of illogic tries to make you think that economic stimulus is the same thing.  The key point about the broken windows fallacy is that something of value was *destroyed*, so the end result was, as the baker said - we could've had the same economic stimulus, and my window, *plus a suit*, but we've lost that suit.  Next this video tries to pretend that spending on public works is the same thing, except that public works actually *creates something of value*.  Now, I know that the hyperconservalibertarian majority here on reddit loves to deny reality and claim that economic stimulus doesn't work, but that's not my point here.  I'm not trying to refute it, so don't try to convince me that it's a bad thing or doesn't work.  That's not the debate I am trying to make, it's a distracting tangent.  The point is this: Whatever you do or don't like about economic stimulus, it is fundamentally a different thing than the hooligan &amp; baker analogy.  If it's bad, it's bad for a different reason.  And this video is anti-educational and should not be promoted.  It's intellectually yucky.
Ahh yes, because our generation is so much better than the others. Most of our age group are so fucking apathetic towards anything that all it's going to take is a company advertising new Popsicles to vote for the next President. So shut up with your self-righteousness.
Ah I had completely skimmed over that!   That makes it more likely that it's a real item that will make it into the final expansion, because this isn't a practical way to boost peoples profession skill to 450+ for beta testing.
From what I hear his signing is set to be announced officially on August 3rd. Can't wait for him to suit up!
&gt; Ok grandpa  Not a grandpa yet.  &gt; Also, just because you are a baby boomer doesn't mean you invented the PC or the internet. Chances are you didn't invent a god-damn thing.  I actually have a patent for an XML-parsing algorithm, so yeah, I did.
Chillin' with Palin is my guess.
Stop putting the pussy on the pedestal !
Did anyone else read that in the Old Spice Guy's voice?
Is this a typo? or is there a movie Poultrygeist.
You really have to ask this question? There are a ton of things that you can do with it. Go practice B&amp;W photography and development for one.
I press charges against people accessing my computer with unauthorized access of a computer system.  Stops them from changing my screensaver!
I cannot wait for Parfit's new book. 
That's why we call them "animals".
The visual inspection before mag drop technique is a good way to make sure that you've actually run dry, instead of having a malfunction of some sort. The only problem is that you can't really do it in some situations in the dark. Some  trainers suggest that method is not that needed, and instead you you should train yourself to feel when your bolt locks to the rear. Give enough ammunition I guess one could do so...   
Absolutely.  Phone, keys, wallet in that order.
hahaha. is it sad that now I kinda want to go.  we should have a reddit meetup there!  by the sounds of it, it shouldn't be to busy.
Full spread please....like you mean it!!!!!!!
[If we're going for the source, this is the only answer](http://www.crystalinks.com/supernova806.jpg)
Oh, I guess XKCD talked about this as well? Although that more so deals with an amalgamation of past language tenses and verbiage, where I'm just stating, 100 years from now, people will think we speak eloquently.
what does being computer-literate have to do with anything?  i'm 63 and very tired of hearing that has any bearing on whether i'm a valuable member of society.
I love it, not sure I would do it myself, but it is really cool. I think the stickers on my truck are enough statement for me...
Create your own free art/music festival then. Nothing is free.
We didn't start the fire..
EXCELLENT contribution...meso hawnee... PS..love the pre-cum shot!
Databank was awesome.  Though I never had one. (had about 5 of these ones.)  Later I got the timex data link watch.  Wireless data transfer! http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Timex_Datalink
Your dog must be a genius!
I would be down to be medic.  I have wanted to try competitive.  http://steamcommunity.com/profiles/76561198027181388  EDIT: I am EST
The downvoting for discussing votes sure hasn't changed as you may have noticed.
I can rarely wage war and win. Hope the Dutch thing gets to me.
Only realized it was on because I was flipping channels while watching TV on an airplane flight. Skateboards still exist? Where's our goddamn hoverboards?
This is a really awesome picture.  I absolutely love how you used the light.  It is wonderfully artistic; very well done.  You have beautiful form and should definitely post more like it.
suggest arrested development. 
P90X!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! 
Absolutely right.  And if they do nothing also, you move on to the next phase of the turn.
Hell, brother, who am I to stand in the way of a day off. Hope it worked out for you. After all, most chainsaws are notorious for fucking up when you need them, right?
Why would anyone pay attention to that idiot Ted Nugent?
The threat of death is the only thing which makes life worth living.
This is a brilliant article. Thank you!
The Republic.  I had a phil proff who said it had often been said that all of western philosophy is a postscript to Plato and I'm inclined to agree with her.  There could be no western philosophical tradition without Plato.
i dont know whether i should upvote this or note. the video wasn't the greatest, and could have explained more to those that aren't familiar with the concept.  people that arent libertarians will unfortunately be quick to bash it because it doest go into enough depth, which means it's a lot easier to dismiss what the implications are of the broken window fallacy. also, retarded accents.
its to get away from all the trolling with just the regulars in it 
I got shit to do,  Don't bother me with that.
I was lost and now i'm found.
Load one of your old save files before you completed the campaign.  They should be in your documents/starcraft 2 in the Unsaved folder.
Breaking Bad... not sci fi, but definitely the best show on TV right now.
...i see the face of death. my concern grows for you. 
I lurk for a reason. How would you like me to prove it. I can post photos of my staff badge, or would you prefer the entire (terribly written) code base for voteforchange?
Er, probably wrong word usage. I meant using stock images and modifying them so they sorta work together in terms of fitting/lighting/etc
I agree, I can't even watch it again because it's such a downer for sure.  Humans suck.
From a past experience, constantly having to explain everything gets old very quick and can lead to some vicious arguments.  I never again had a relationship with someone who was not as intelligent as me.  If it is just for now, a rebound girl, then who cares how smart she is.  If you are looking for long term then the fact your are questioning it now may be a good indicator for you.  How important is intelligence to you?  For me, being able to have a meaningful conversation with someone who understands what I am saying is very fulfilling and sexy!
Tonemapped HDR images tend to look awful to me. Enfuse is a lot more tasteful/subtle/natural.
I like the "dogshit goatfuck" criticism.
Ever? *eyroll* It was cute but ruined with 'ever'.
People wanted pictures to remember their loved ones. Often they might only have a couple of pictures taken in their lives. At least the people in my family from 90-110 years ago, I'm lucky if I can find one picture of them.   I think the pictures are sad, but mourning wasn't something people tried to avoid in those days. 
Sorry to hear about your squash! Vine borers got mine this year too :(
Not a good or responsible idea at that age. 
I have always asked myself that same question.  Front pocket.   *grammar
Please don't.
s m o k e w e e d e v e r y d a y
Inconceivable!
That was called for in the initial designs, but the engineering budget got cut and they had to ship what they had.
"In the pipe, 5, 5, 5."
Now ask what happens if you're born on the Greek isle of Lesbos...
[This](http://userscripts.org/scripts/show/82588) was the first script I noticed (and thus installed).  At first, you had to disable the autoplay by changing a variable in the script to true, but now disabling autoplay is the default behavior.
If it's any consolation, I'm a woman and guys who juggle more than one woman at a time make me uncomfortable. I think I fall in love much more easily and with less reservations with men like you. 
Someday, you might lose someone *you* love.  ...or someone who loved you.  ...or maybe you don't have those kinds of relationships with anyone.  ...even money.
aww man, why? 
I've read this somewhere before. 
Maybe you can do a mini AMA for me: why would your girlfriend or you ever think this is okay?  The reason I think it's not okay is because it's completely indistinguishable from an affair and provides a precedent that easily allows for an affair.  Anyway, I if/when you do speak to her about it it's extremely important to speak only of yourself and never refer to her or her actions as if they were wrong in any way, and try not to refer to her actions at all (I'm referring to this case, in others it might be okay to refer to her actions as wrong in my book).  WRONG: You spent the night at a guy friend's house and it made me have bad feelings.  RIGHT: I found that I was having some unexpected bad feelings about this past weekend.  I've been hurt in the past and I feel those things come back to me.  I realize I said I was okay with it and that was true when I said it.  When the weekend came, I realized I was not okay with the situation I found myself in.  I found my boundaries...  That sort of thing, in my humble opinion, are the way to approach these things. 
Great Q&amp;A
TLDR; Find a cause and contact them, be prepared to work.
this is the most retarded thing I've seen on reddit in a long time.
&gt; _Not slower than the flow, but too close to the car in front of them. That's the main cause._  Yes, slower than the flow. Slower traffic causes people behind them to slow down and merge left to pass. This slows down traffic in both lanes. From overhead you can watch a rolling "bubble" of traffic surrounding a slow vehicle. If the traffic is dense it can set off a massive standing wave.  &gt; _The way to stop the wave is to put more distance between you and the car in front so that you don't have to react directly to their speed changes._  This assumes that everyone is traveling at the same rate. If they aren't, following at a certain distance doesn't work. In those cases you're supposed to pass on the left, but in heavy traffic there's usually either a righteous prick driving too slow in the left lane, or so many cars that you can't get over before you have to slow down. Once you slow down, the same thing happens to the guy behind you and thus the wave begins.  I'm fascinated by the fact that left lane campers want to slow down people they perceive as going too fast on the one hand, but on the other hand don't seem to want to own up to their responsibility for impeding traffic flow (slowing people down).  EDIT - Second point added.
ME too. I own my own business. I noticed how many writeoffs and shell games a company could play with taxes that a employed human could never do. I imagine (no, I KNOW) that Fortune 500 companies have even more money saving scams than small businesses.
Who cares. Shark week starts tomorrow.
HAHAH THAT FACE [](/yey)
The harms of copyright continue to increase with longer terms, but the benefits begin to wane.  I believe that quite a bit of research has been done on this, and from memory the optimal term is closer to the oringal ~14 years for copyright of books, a bit longer if you want to protect a very small minority of authors making significant cash off their back catalogs.  Note that we've successfully exported our law through international treaties; other nations have not seen a similar boom. Very few creators decide not to create because their works will only be protected for 30 years instead of 100+.
***Certified Reddit's Bitch*** ::**STAMP**::   
Unless Beck actually urged people to go kill members of the organization, I think he is protected by free speech laws. Sadly, loonies will rant and other loonies will listen to them. I would like to see some further discussion of where the legal laws are drawn. 
"great events"
 ┌─┐  ┴─┴  ಠ_ರೃ
No friends.
I believe it's for the Rolling Roadshow. Could be wrong, though. 
I fear the banning of cluster bombs will be the slippery slope to banning clusters of oats.
That may be good for NASA. NASA needs some fund.
It will almost certainly cost you less per pound to buy whole chickens than boneless skinless breasts. The actual cost per pound of meat is obscured by the presence of bones, but either way it's not very expensive. If you buy whole chickens, you'll also be able to use the bones to make your own stock!
Sergio, you are hilarious. That is all.
if you still have one, i would love one!
Check before leaving, REDTABOO.
You're nobody online without a handle.  
OH. MY. GOD.
Haha yeah, we were thinking of incorporating a vibrator in our sex play. Just need to find a good, not too expensive one, and where to buy it from.   The only orgasms I have are from indirect clitoral stimulation (induced by myself only), and I'm not even sure they are orgasms. It's just getting hornier and then it stops, no explosion-fireworks-omg feelings.  Don't worry, it's not making me feel bad :) I'm glad there's someone with a similar experience to point me in the right direction! Thank you!
As long as he wasn't dumping it on anyone, probably not that awful. The local health department might disagree with me though.
A sentence? I can do it in one word: reciprocity
By killing someone you're also eliminating any chance they have of pleasure.
does gum get in braces?
I'm not upset about the posting of the actual cost of an Apple product. They're expensive, they're good, and I'm fine with that. I'm just correcting the (extremely frequent) misrepresentation that you can buy an equally specced Thinkpad (or other high-quality brand laptop typically shipped with Windows) for 20-30% of the price. That's just untrue.
You seem like you might still be depressed, and this is the thing you need to deal with first and fully work through, so that you can find and be in a relationship that is secure and satisfying for you and that won't become a co-dependent scenario (because when you're depressed and being with a certain person makes you happy, you do end up being dependent on them rather than able to confidently be happy in your own life and enjoy sharing that with another person).  Therapy is not necessarily for everyone, but seeing one doctor and not connecting doesn't mean you should give up. There are a wide variety of methods, and I personally recommend cognitive therapy. Practicing good methods of thinking vs. negative hurtful ones is a tremendous skill to learn. There's a number of cognitive worksheets available online; I suggest you try them and if you like where they're going, look for a doc who specializes in cognitive.   You're doubting yourself now because you're depressed. Don't focus on self-doubt and worrying that you'll hurt someone else. You are a thoughtful creature. You thought it through and you left her, and that took guts. Of course you miss her, you spent years in a relationship with her. It's only natural to miss her and to see her doing well without you to be upsetting. It's okay to feel these things. It's normal. You know that you have a lot of work to do figuring out who you are, and it's normal for that to be intimidating. Just keep putting one foot in front of the other, and you will get there. It's okay for it to suck right now being where you are. But it will get better slowly (having recovered from depression myself, I'll say it's going to feel like the slowest thing in the entire goddamn world). But you get there eventually. And hopefully, when you get there, you'll have learned alot  about yourself. And those things will take you to new and interesting places and people that you can't even imagine right now.   tl;dr It's okay to feel depressed. Try cognitive therapy. 
Basketball
No, but if you're feeding someone else...
[Don't test me, I'll do it!](http://imgur.com/jjBZX.jpg)
Only been here 4 months and never noticed you could sort by best before.
If it wasn't for the last generation, the Civil Rights act probably wouldn't have been passed.
uh...try again...   oh, i'm stoned 24/7 look at meh, ize so funny...jerk...jerk...squirt
&gt; It must be the apocalypse  FTFY
Mine didn't line up luckily. They probably don't actually line up. The coolest bit about those houses is if you actually build one you can get pretty crazy and customized. Maybe someday...
Fuck you, I've wanted one of those since 3rd grade.  You saying they're *still* available just twists the knife in an old wound.
I think you eventually get burned enough times, and start to feel like putting all your eggs in one basket is a mistake.  Whereas you have "I don't want to give up hope,", I have "I don't want to get attached to this girl yet." It also helps to have a system where you are constantly getting new women in your life.  Online dating is good at this.  
That's not quite accurate - slightly better outcomes have been found for some patients who are undergoing cardiac arrest primarily due to cardiac causes (rather than respiratory causes) when CPR is given by a layman with no training. The current issue (and online content) of [The New England Journal](http://www.nejm.org/) has several studies on this exact topic.  Overall though, if you don't really know what you're doing - stick with the chest compressions.
One time my room mate played WoW for 84 hours straight. He didn't shower or change his clothes once, and didn't even get up to pee. I think he filled three 2-liter Mtn. Dew  bottles with piss. Didn't poo at all. It turns out he missed two tests during this time, and flunked out about a month later to live with his mom.
Let's just hope this guy can't keep it up.
&gt;"Well, go date somebody new if that bothers you." I hate to be blunt, but there's your answer. No mature man that wants a relationship to work utters those words. He won't change. Either he isn't ready to share his mind or never will want to or be able to share his mind, or there may be an intellectual divide.   You can't convince someone to want to talk to you.
I think it makes you look like a tool.
My monitor weighs more than my computer.
Hm, I think there's potential for actual discussion here.
Should of used trollface, Rick Trolled. [](/troll "But points well deserved sir")
Not everyone, only shitty servers.  Like you.
First movie I ever watched on the Netflix streaming service from my BluRay player. Documentary called "Brothers Keeper" about a rural farmer who is charged with his brothers murder. It sends this little farm town in to frenzy in the 80's, the three brothers are trapped in old times and I don't think have ever left their town.  My wife and I really liked it.
What is the point of this?
It's the publishing rights for the song. Every radio station in the country has to pay it, movies pay it for using a song in a film, internet radio stations have to pay it.  Basically anyone that makes $$ by playing an artist's song has to pay a usage fee. Artists get $$ from these usage fees. Why do you think Michael Jackson bought the publishing rights to the Beatles catalog. It was worth 100s of millions.  Artists deserve to get paid when the songs are played over &amp; over again and by someone to make money off that usage.  And the smart artists get control of their publishing rights.
For all you recreational smokers out there, once you're in the system, they make oodles of money on you even if you don't have to serve any time.  It's $100 a  pop here for a drug test which you are ordered to take (repeatedly) and you get to pay for.  You are also required to do some sort of rehab, or counseling, guess who pays for that hahahhahah!  Oh, and you can't choose your counselor, they assign you one, court approved, of course, that's who you pay, and pay WHATEVER they say it costs. There are lots and lots of things to pay for of which court costs are only the tippy-top of the list. 
Piazzolla is the best....
Never marry a man you wouldn't go into business with.
I got mine taken out of the purchase price, so instantly.  I bought through their website :D
That's sad, and funny. 
I found a friend of mine who had committed suicide. It was a hanging though, so at least it was neat. I'd like to think he found some measure of relief. 
Americans actually still believing the official story of 9/11 when even the commissioners have said it was a lie.  While the dopey ones chanted USA USA USA supporting the united corporations of america imperial agenda for the middle east 100's of thousands were murdered.  The american apathy/ignorance of all things global outside the operation mockingbird media is the most disturbing thing this planet endures.  EDIT: Down voting doesn't change a thing, all it does is reinforce my position that americans are mainly dumb fuck cowards who cant deal with the truth. Typical of cowards.
I was in line for a Bruce Springsteen concert back in the late 80's and this couple about 3 people in front kept letting friends cut in (probably about 20 in all). Of course we all did the white couple thing and complain to our significant other. The couple, and all the friends, were the typical loud mouth jerks.   So an hour later when we finally get to the gate...they realize they brought their tickets to the first concert which they missed 2 days ago, not their real tickets for today's event.   Every couple that passed them called them some rude name as they walked through the gate and told security they were scammer's... while they argued with security guard about their hones mistake.  Karma I believe in...God....not so much.
I might care if it actually happened.
If you cannot see the potential, then perhaps you are suffering a lack of imagination present in those who are going to exploit the technology.   Frankly, I am not worried, cannot see a reason why someone would not be bored to death with the location of my purchase.   It is the loss of privacy.  The fact that one of those embedded chips links up to a URL. Katherine Albrechts book is worth a look.   
I've somewhat found that with the Burner/Raver community, although I definitely appreciate the suggestion to check out of the explict LGBT/queer organizations. In any case, I think it's a fair and good point that I need to be expanding my social contacts to deprecate my history, such will help a great deal in moving past a regretful past. Thank you.
I cross myself: Wallet, Watch, Spectacles, and Testicles. Don't leave home without the big four.
This is legit, I know the guy.
Thanks for your comment. Trouble is I haven't spoken to anyone about any of this. Most of my friends don't even know she is ill. I guess I'm disappointed in myself because I can't feel the way I think I should. 
Theres no such thing as magic. It was probably an electro magnetic force field.
Alice in Wonderland by Tim Burton
Wow, -4 in a matter of 5 minutes. Is this some kind of record?
Les Paul.
I suggest that you Dubai the book, it makes a great addition to the coffee table.
I'll give you the straight-up on the language right away: If you aren't already fluent in German or another language from the Germanic group of languages, you will probably not be able to learn too much. The grammar just isn't that easy, and there's too many irregular words with their own strange patterns.   Oslo is just big enough to have just about every sub-culture and niche activity there is, the problem is just to find out where these things are happening.   Apart from that, the fun thing to do in Oslo, is blonde women. 
You know, like blowing up a star n shit :p 
Some people missed their calling as police and they're determined to make up for it by forcing you to drive whatever speed they feel comfortable with.
The van that it is on is totally appropriate. 
The parting of the Red Sea.
Buy him a hat.  Also, blowjob.
I'd use silicone caulk as an interim fix. 
Yup, I'm doing pretty well. Thank you!
It's all up to the user.  Don't open ports or authenticate traffic then.
Man that voice sounds familiar... Is that Sheila from Red vs. Blue?
Oh wow, it's an urban legend!  Coming clean: A friend told me this story at the pub a while back, said it had happened not to his mother but to his friends mother. I should know better than to have trusted a friend of a friend story :)
Or not.
I think that post was by Michael Scott.
Scroll down button?
The Magicians Birthday - Uriah Heep  The Wizard - Uriah Heep  [The Bard's Song (In the Forest) + The Bards Song (The Hobbit) by Blind Guardian.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=sC7iR577OQw)   Rhapsody, Blind Guardian, Dio, Dragonforce, some Iron Maiden songs, some other [Uriah Heep](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=pEdKcblmctA), Hammerfall, lots of Scandinavian and Norwegian metal bands. Or you could just google "Power Metal" and find some that way.   *edit* some links
PANDO DUDE, free app,  Send up to 1gb emails!
Every single comic book movie ever. Even when they're decent they're still disappointing.
Get the fuck out.
They're coming for you. Hell, we're all coming for you.
Sorry for the confusion I was talking about the IP he has.
Not "church", "[Church's](http://www.churchs.com/index.html)".  It's good chicken, too.
&gt; TL:DR - we mock Christians for evangelicalism, in being evangelical about our atheism how are we any better.  Mockery is hardly evangelizing. Pointing out serious factual problems with religious claims isn't evangelizing, either.  I think that the impression you have of atheism has been negatively influenced by /r/atheism. I say that because the front page content of /r/atheism seems like it's usually **50% crap**. If you think that the content posted to /r/atheism is representative of most atheists, I can understand being a bit worried.  First:  * **The downvote button is not the disagree button** (Thanks for that one, [painordelight](http://www.reddit.com/r/atheism/comments/cvu6g/has_anyone_else_ever_questioned_if_we_are_as_bad/c0vobt7).) * **I'm saying this because I want /r/atheism to have better content.**  So, what do I mean by **crap**?  * As I post this, the top two submissions on /r/atheism are a re-re-re-repost of the Popemobile and a picture of a goddamn chicken sandwich. * Story number 5 is a Hitler quote. Yes, we know that Hitler believed in some kind of weird-ass nazified form of Christianity. (Well, most of us do--more on that later.) * Story number seven is a re-re-re-post of the classic "who killed more people in the bible" bar chart. (Spoiler: God wins.) * Further down, there are two more image submissions in reply to the chicken sandwich. One is witty, one is not. Neither are actually interesting or capable of holding my attention for more than a second. * There's a post about how ID's deliberate vagueness leaves it open to some very, very silly interpretations. I appreciate the effort, but it's old news. * Next we have the "Christian tramp stamp." It's amusing, as are most stupid tattoos, but could we keep this stuff in /r/wtf? The *only* reason it got posted here was because it's a tattoo of a bible verse. * Following that, Stupid Christian Facebook Posts: Episode MCXVII. * Finally, we've got another "LOL at this dumb Christian" submission, courtesy of the website Clients From Hell.  Halfway down the page, I lost interest in reading any more submissions because the signal-to-noise ratio is so awful.  In my opinion, /r/atheism needs:  * Fewer image posts. Please. I've seen them all several times now.  * Fewer "LOL what a dumbass" posts. I'm no longer amused by the run-of-the-mill dumbassery that is the subject of most of these posts. * More *real news* that's of interest to atheists. E.g., news about court cases focusing on religious freedom (and freedom from religion), atheists running for public office, etc. * More lengthy, thought-provoking submissions. There's too much intellectual "junk food" here. * An archive for image posts, which would provide hours of entertainment for newbies and (hopefully) reduce the number of re-re-re-posted images. * A FAQ for new atheist readers, with links to recommended reading material and a list of commonly re-re-re-posted submissions ("ZOMG, Hitler was a Christian!", etc.) I'm recommending a new, second FAQ because the current FAQ seems to be written for theists rather than atheists.  That's my rant and those are my suggestions. It may seem tangential to the original post, but I'm pretty sure that we would see fewer concern posts like this if the content of /r/atheism wasn't so spotty. (Which would also enhance the quality of the /r/atheism front page.)
Definitely. I was going to post this.
So female readers are "bitches"? eek
Assholes with the stretch mark comments! Your body is great. I didnt even notice the plants till I read the thread. I am a mom too :)
This is the first I have heard of it. Thanks. More info: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sacred_Harp
Until these Jews go on the record condemning the actions of Israelis in Palestine, they should kindly sit down and shut the fuck up. 
I refuse to freak out over something that I cannot prevent.
Yes but slightly different. I also always carry a micro fiber cloth with mw to clean my glasses. Cloth in front left pocket, phone in front right pocket, and wallet in back right pocket. Anything else including keys goes in my front left pocket where there is the most room. 
Why am I laughing so hard at this?!
The creation of the Earth. 
I knew chickens can swim, but gingers?
Yes.  I call it the trinity.
It's their prerogative.
or elderly.
I think I'm going to make your rant my dating website bio. It's so hot.
It is probably related to [the pigs](http://aleksandreia.files.wordpress.com/2009/11/pigslice2.jpg?w=500&amp;h=808) that are concerned about our convenience.
&gt;Kiss my arse!   Goethe, Goethe!   Götz von Berlichingen! Second act;   You know the scene too well!   Let's sing out now summarily:   Here is Mozart literary!  Sounds like rap.
Agreed.   I read that first sentence in entirety, then turned my head 80 degrees to the left to my movie/book shelf - with both the book AND movie sitting there unopened - and muttered a single, quiet 'fuck'.
What's the name of this organisation? Seems like something I'd be comfortable working with :]
I can't be everywhere saying, "Fuck you" to everybody. I am just one man. I didn't read through her IAmA so I have no idea what her reasons were, but I recognize there are circumstances by which her actions could be justified. However, aside from "it pays the mortgage," I cannot think of any circumstances by which the malware guy's actions would be justified. It is writing malicious software which serves no positive purpose with the sole intent on making money.
He could've been undressing, she saw it and burst out laughing and then just told him no.
As soon as you say "soul,"  I know I might as well be talking to a voodoo priest from Sudan...throwing in the supernatural is always a conversation stopper.  Suffering is not "human."  If you can watch an animal being vivisected and tell me its not suffering, you are pathological.  If suffering is just what humans think it is, so be it, since we only know what we know.  We know poison sickens and kills, sharpness and heat and cold hurt and the depravation of any bodily function causes discomfort.  No one is stupid enough to say childbirth should be avoided, but wait, haven't we humans come up with drugs and methods to reduce that pain?  I only ask that we do this for all living things which can suffer, and reduce the amount of suffering in the world.  We know not of a world beyond this.  To think of it in terms of cosmic karma does our noble existence a dishonor.
When the machines rise up, that man is in deep shit.
*I* still use a 17" CRT, attached to a Mac Mini.  It's great for heating up the room during the winter; I prefer watching video on it to my TV.
Waiter, or Professor or in some surprisingly big companies..CEO. 
I'm bored and unemployed. I'm in. 
giggidy giggidy
Indeed they have! They must have updated it when Duels of the Planeswalkers came out, it's much nicer now.  Before, you used to manually move a card from the deck to your hand, move the counters, etc etc... a 5 move game would last 10 minutes.
Please tell me why
Very very dark, frenetic, well done. Darren Aronofsky's movies are all up in my faves.
Un Ballo in Maschera is fine, too.
i guess they dont want to talk about multicam 
The Christians are going to have a field day atheist-bashing this rhetoric.  There's venting and then there's just being a tool.  Prepare for the fallout posts.
I would recomend to just  like pretend you are a vegitarian and buy a vegitarian cookbook - they have great recepies now that are healthy and high in nutritional value - without meat you really need to know how to cook such that you get the proper vitimans and minerals.  I think you should go to a nutritionist to make sure that you receive all of your needed vitimans and minerals since often, vegitarians don't.  You may need supliments.
i see this as a two prong approach for motivation:  1. get a workout buddy to go with you everytime, at least four times a week. within a month or two, you'll feel weird if you don't go to the gym without him/her. then you'll feel weird not going at all. this is the most important motivator.  2. breakup your workouts cardio/weightlifting. it should breakup the monotony. end your workouts with cardio. 
8-bit 3D!
Start a mobileme trial account. You can store up to 10gb in their cloud. Upload your file to your public folder. The public folder can be password protected. The trial is free for the first 60 days but they do ask for a CC#, so just remember to cancel before the trial is over and you're golden.
100 years ago - women couldn't vote.  50 years ago - blacks could not got to the same school as whites.  Gays are only now being allowed to marry in some states.  Progress happens with younger generations, but it's not entirely done... we stand on the shoulders of giants, those few in the generation before us with the imagination and courage to do the right thing.  So unless you are one of those courageous few, sir, you can go fuck yourself too.
* Super Mario Brothers.  One of the most disappointing movies of my childhood. * Wing Commander * Queen of the Damned * Slaughterhouse 5 * Spawn  Edit: formatting
* Carnivale  * Mad Men  * The Wire  *  Lost  * The Sopranos  * Curb Your Enthusiasm  * Six Feet Under  Off the top of my head.
1/7
Some people just want to see the world burn.
I love this album. It's among the few albums that I consider perfect and I love(and listen) from beginning to end
Mmm, I find it the opposite - his later work seems more austere to me and he eventually abandoned dialogue form.  The dialogue can be used as you said but it's best when you present both sides in their best light, and I think Plato cheats and too often has some sophist or other interlocuter lob a softball at Socrates followed by Socrates starting a line of questioning that reduces the guy to 'yes, surely', 'of course, i agree', 'yes, anyone can see this to be true', etc. etc. while Socrates goes on and on.
[/r/circlejerk](http://www.reddit.com/r/circlejerk) is easy mode as well.
about it.
You might want to go and check who owns the Telegraph.
Yeah, I am happy Verizon doesn't do that, or at least not to that extent. Thanks for the link!
i vaguely remember this but can't find anything on google. what is it from?
jesus fucking christ you win
Yes, the average age of FOX News viewers is in the 60's - as is the average age of ABC News viewers, NBC News viewers, and CBS News viewers.   Using a decontextualized statistic like this to insinuate that all older viewers are watching FOX is intellectually dishonest at best.  edit: fixed typo
Upvote for DEFCON, though it might not be great for morale during deployment. Possibly the scariest game ever, however it is utterly gripping.  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9AzkZWKa6x4&amp;hd=1 gives a good idea of what it is all about. The soundtrack is so stunningly evocative it's even for sale on iTunes…
A lot of security is, frankly, security theater. Like the TSA employees at the airport, they make you feel safer than you actually are. Of course, in this case, the security theater is put on for more than just yourself. Thieves are looking for several key things when deciding which house to rob, and ensuring yours looks like a pain, they'll pick someone else. Don't feel bad, they're going to rob somebody, so better them than you, right? I know that sounds cruel, but getting yourself robbed hoping to save someone else the trouble is just stupid.  I'd change the locks, if only because new locks will likely be more difficult to brute-force your way through, and who knows who has a copy of the key now. It will also give you some piece of mind. While you're at it, make sure your house is easily visible to the neighbors (thieves love having cover) and if possible, get shatter-resistant glass windows. Go for an alarm. Whether it calls the cops or not is irrelevant, just get one that's loud. A lot of thieves will run when an alarm goes off.  The point of security is not to make your home a maximum security prison, or an impenetrable fortress, it's to make your home as undesirable a target as possible, and to ward off anyone dumb enough to try. You'll deter pretty much every low-level thief with a few easy to see security measures, and can catch most medium level thieves who will try to use brute force to get in. A higher level criminal probably won't care as much, but I doubt they'll target you unless you give them a reason to.
Some idiot in Boston *just* tried this two weeks ago. [It didn't end well for him.](http://www.universalhub.com/2010/dorchester-man-discovers-yes-police-do-come-faster)
&gt; I think you should still use the WAN port.  The problem is that the modem *and* another router are located elsewhere. There is only one cable connecting them, so it can't be with the wan port or the devices connected to that other router aren't really on the same network as the ones on the 54GL. (I think? something like that anyway)  I'm going to move the Tomato one and change it to be the main router which I think should solve all of my problems.
Methinks he doth protest too much.
[Here](http://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/cvuyi/look_guys_i_also_found_him/c0vnlnx) is the comment thread if anybody wants it.
ditto. 
You might want to look into Windows Live Sky Drive.  It's free but you (and your buddy) will have to sign up for a live.com email address.  Basically you get something like 25GB of on-line storage that you can upload to (and he/she can download from).
Freaks and Geeks, it only lasted for 1 season but it was an excellent show.
This one time I wore a T-shirt that said "Don't taze me bro!".  But as I was punching a police officer in the face his partner tazed me!  Some people just have no consideration.
You can't unsee the human face...
When I first got mine I had a lot of fun shooting objects with a flash on each side. I love rim lighting.   http://farm3.static.flickr.com/2620/4013519634_424de01bfe_z.jpg?zz=1
Ugh, I have a degree in Women's Studies and I hated that they could find sexism in EVERYTHING. We discussed buildings as well and how they are a symbol of male power. I just rolled my eyes.
Grandpa, you musn't get so excited, your heart will explode.
This disease will never be wiped out by vaccination alone.  There are  cases of people coming down with the disease who HAVE been vaccinated.
I was going to say this but then I thought...people who believe this shit aren't the most reasonable people on the planet and even with a film I'm pretty sure they wouldn't care :|
Lame. Twist and turn all you want you cannot deny. Diiissssmisssed.
In a weird way, Big Trouble.  Dave Barry is good for an easy laugh. The novel was actually pretty funny, and had a lot going on. The movie was so bad that most people reading this post will not remember that it was ever released.
You may want to check out my very favorite friend Power Conduit, who can remove a counter *of any kind* from a permanent you control, and in turn place a +1/+1 counter on a creature you control OR a charge counter on an artifact you control.
It's not like the bread was supposed to be a treat... Read the [relevant passage](http://www.nobeliefs.com/washingtonnews/EzekielBread.htm) and look up the directions for baking it...
http://www.reddit.com/r/aww/comments/8uooy/i_comes_wif_2_sub_woofers/
Well that's confirmed it the older generation is a bunch of grumpy old bastards.
I was hoping for a happy ending to that story.
[Left Coast](http://files.posterous.com/maryjanesemporium/WJBmAK4J35IHqU9Jt2a69cAGhCGzuAAI3BbwJYYDswZI8yfbCAtwql5Os87f/leftcoast_waterpipes.jpg.scaled.500.jpg?AWSAccessKeyId=1C9REJR1EMRZ83Q7QRG2&amp;Expires=1280621784&amp;Signature=EBvoc3o63Iq3FSzN2NBUeMp51Ro%3D) Ok so what if it's not an imgur link.
...like intertheoretic reduction? Have you read much into the philosophy of history? To grossly simplify it, one must essentially assess the process as a collapse or a progression..sheesh creeping dualisms....
I only have the former, but sometimes I forget it!
I hate it when people list incorrect information, and then don't list a source but just say 'look it up.' They know most people will be too lazy to look it up and assume they're correct... they never are.
Please don't tell me you're riding the clutch to sit still on a hill.
Not church.  Church's Chicken.
I've been trying for a while. I don't think we'll ever get along. I'm just trying to make sure she has some good memories of me. 
Sorry this is my fault. I'll do a better job about this next time. Is there anything I can do to make it a reddit only tournament? Make them use them post their reddit account or something?
an otter? how did you get it?
True on the selection bias, but they did make things simpler and they did make things to last. Companys rarely compete on quality because most people cannot see quality when they are shopping at K Mart. The quality shows up 10 years after shopping at K Mart. Doo dads look great when shopping at K Mart.
just don't give it away for free. make sure the employer knows what you are trying to do and is willing to compensate you for your efforts.   It's pretty similar to apple upselling you from an iphone 3GS to an iphone 4  They don't simply give you a bunch of new features out of the blue, you have to make another investment to get them. 
If you know they're not going for armored/massive units, you could try a variation that's more Warp Gate heavy (if you didn't know this, Warp Gates produce faster than Gateways and are almost always worth getting); skimp on the Immortals and go for Colossi (ALWAYS get extended range on those guys), with Zealots as meatshields or Sentries for FF. Or completely bypass the Robo and get a Stargate instead. Experiment with the Graviton beam on Phoenixes (tanks are especially yummy for those guys). It's very important to know what units your opponent has. If he has a ton of air, then of course you'll have to be prepared for that with Stalkers/Phoenixes/Void Rays. Also, like Day9 says, try not to branch out too much with your tech paths. Don't build all three unit-producing structures unless you really know what you're doing with the build.   One way I like to mess around is with FFA. It's not super competitive, and there will always be some idiot that tries to mass Void Rays, but it's unranked. It's kind of a safe way to try out new builds and strategies, if you're really worried about your win-loss ratio.
oops yeah, the uncle. But either way, the tears still happen
[41,231,441 people](http://www.reddit.com/r/DoesAnybodyElse/comments/cvww5/dea_wish_that_you_could_dislike_something_on/c0vohvt) dislike this
That's what /r/atheism is for, not personal confrontations when the folks were being relatively passive.
Possibly. But if that's the case I doubt that he's telling the truth about 5 inches.
1 is absolutely not 0.
That'd really suck for men who are infertile and have to utilize a sperm donor, wouldn't it?
A dozen washers set to to kill would be awesome. I'll bring the quarters. 
That and the rest of it.
SAN DIMAS HIGH SCHOOL FOOTBALL RULES!!!
Congratulations, you win! The computer has no possible words left to use. 408 words were used in your game.  The last two words were 'gnat' and 'gnaw'.  I was so proud of myself when gnaw popped into my head.  [If anyone cares](http://i.imgur.com/2zOa7.png)
Not as cool as *4* Deloreans...
It's a simple mathematical formula.
"Grave of the Fireflies"  the entire fucking thing.  THEN go read about the author on wikipedia and cry some more.
It seems to me that if you're doing all this to eek out a few hours, you probably shouldn't have a smartphone...
nice save at [1:27](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1aeH-5rqNLk#t=1m27s)
Actually gloves are the only gear that doesn't make me sweat so it never bothers me to wear.
I guess I am heartless b/c I thought TS3 was excellent in every way, except I don't recall any tears being jerked. I guess hearing how sad it would be from redditors for the past how many weeks kinda hyped it out of me. Through the whole movie I was expecting "that sad moment" to come. The ending felt more depressing &amp; optimistic at the same time rather than sniffles &amp; sad.
Unless you really need Unlocker 1.9.0, I have a copy of Unlocker 1.8.4 which doesn't have that bullshit, if you want it.
I have horrible panic attacks.  And i know this method will bite me in the ass one day when i do actually die... but until then it works.  I just say to myself "bring that shit on panic attack.  You havent beaten me yet... shit ive not even passed out or anything.  Do your worse... ill survive it.  punk ass panic attack"   edit:  also thats my new single... due to drop August 9th.  :P
No, it's not a picture of your prom date.
There will be another, probably in a month's timeframe.
Fuck you, I don't even like popsicles.
Damnnnn yoouuu Cracker Barrel! 
Run slower. You're going too fast if you feel like you're going to hurl after every run. 
A lot of people posting in this subreddit are walking a thin line between being frugal and being cheap, my advice is that if you ever feel dirty after saving a few bucks you probably overdid it. I heard this somewhere "Money can be earned, spent, and earned again, but time you can never get back"
Most people who talk about time travel are actually imagining something like time-teleportation.  Where you instantly pop from HERE and NOW to THERE and THEN, rather than traveling there.  You'd need to travel through space as well as time.  Imagine if rather than having a time machine, you found a back door in your apartment.  Exiting through this door, there is an alleyway, and you walk along it, meeting nobody, until you encounter another door - the back door to the shop.  You open the door, and see yourself spilling coffee (or perhaps it was you that bumped your elbow).  Assuming that there is a special set of doors and alleyways which warp time and space sufficiently to create a path you can traverse, this makes imagining time travel paradoxes simpler than imagining time-teleportation.
&gt;Last night I realized why African Americans are athletically superior and intellectually inferior. Because you're African American and you bring down the average intellect of African Americans? 
meh, not really  I'll worry about death when I die.
Justin Long wasn't in The Girl Next Door. 
You do.
I like GayTube too [](/troll)
I love Sam!
That part is actually true.
Come over here, honey. You're standing so close, you're going to turn it into a male!
I've seen videos with three x's: XXX.  What are they *doing* to get *six* x's?
There is only two options when drunk.   If I'm out, then we have to stop at Sunrise for rotis. Double-cheese and chip roti to be precise. Its about the size of my fore-arm. Its awesome.   At home thugh, best drunken meal is toast with bully-beef, tons of onions, egg and chilli sauce.   Now I'm hungry.
It's certainly not. I'm an avid fan of A Perfect Circle and Puscifer as well. Oh glorious Puscifer- MJK has the power to dress Milla Jovovich in a sexy outfit and duet with him. And he's a full time vintner. Is there anything the man cannot do?
That's because the Intel integrated cards are a joke, they don't even use those in the Macbooks anymore.
Relied on both, then just a condom, then just birth control. Get scared lots. Plan for next time? Revert back to condom &amp; birth control = no scare
Yes you **are** stuck with a tethered jailbreak, and it takes like 20 steps to get there.  Comex has been saying for weeks now that the Jailbreak will be ready soon, but I'd suggest just staying with 3.1.3 until it's released.
Veni, Vidi, Vinci.
the bambi molesters are my fav surf rock band!
Are you homophobic or racist?
`WHO HAS TOLD YOU THIS INFORMATION?`
She's not someone who has lots of friends anyway... and those she holds dear she contacts via e-mail or Moshi Monsters anyway. Technology's a wonderful thing ;-)
If he goes down and stays down you are fine. Enjoy the ride.
this is why i'm not having any. if anything, i'll adopt. the wife agrees. we already have 2 babies -- our dogs.
Is that sorta like a tramp stamp?
Why couldn't the conversation happen before the delivery room? Or after delivery?
"Wow! There are whole countries out there being run by foreigners."  American dollars are always welcome, even in developed countries with their own currency.  America is the only country where English is spoken.
Just got started this afternoon, Teevin, Gnome Rogue! 
Or this Lol  http://imgur.com/xkNBR
I kinda liked the full minute of anticipation leading up to that part.
haha yes, given my name its a total wtf post without the sarcasm, my apologies and /facepalm
And ironically, those who slam the break are the ones who think they are the good drivers because they also slam the accelerator and think that they are helping traffic by reacting quickly and tailgating and driving aggressively. 
anatomy 
I don't think they're necessary, but I doubt they're hurting you, either. If you're taking an aspirin daily, though, it should be a low-dose one meant for daily use, not the higher dosage tablets meant to be used as an occasional pain killer.
Pedobear Just got V&amp;
I am 20 and I'm going to go to a driving school soon. What are your tips for me?
Too soon.
because we ignore it...deny it...pretend it isn't true...look at my life...trollololol
I truly wish I could kiss and hug her. But it would be the weirdest thing.  I haven't hugged her since I was about 5 years old. It's not how my family rolls. 
Hey, the point is that the young need to vote. Statistically they don"t. 
If this was your first thought something is wrong 
Reeding is for fagotts. 
From the LA Times:  *Motocross rider Paris Rosen suffered a Grade Two concussion, a contusion of his right lung, a mild liver laceration as well as injuries to his rib cartilage and left hip.*
This is all very true. You generally must treat email with HTML 4.0 standards. However, Campaign Monitor had a blog post a few weeks ago about doing background images: http://www.campaignmonitor.com/blog/post/3192/add-a-background-image-to-individual-table-cells/  (Note: I am not affiliated with CM, I just use their service where I work)
